Mississippi, session 2026, SB2250.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  Not withstanding any federal law to the contrary, from and after the effective date of this act, the governing authority of any state, county or municipal agencies, departments, institutions or offices, and its political subdivisions, are prohibited from entering into a minority set-aside contract with a minority business or from providing minority businesses with preferential treatment in regards to public contracts and purchases, on the basis of race, ethnicity or sex of the business owner or owners. (2)  As used in this section, "minority business" means a business which is owned by a person or a majority of persons who are United States citizens or permanent resident aliens (as defined by the Immigration and Naturalization Service) of the United States, and who are classified as a minority.  For the purpose of this section, "minority" means a person who is a citizen or lawful permanent resident of the United States and who is: (a)  African American or Black:  having origins in any of the black racial groups of Africa; (b)  Hispanic or Latino:  of Mexican, Puerto Rican, Cuban, Central or South American, or other Spanish or Portuguese culture or origin regardless of race; (c)  Asian:  having origins in any of the original peoples of the Far East, Southeast Asia, the Indian subcontinent, or the Pacific Islands; (d)  American Indian or Alaskan Native:  having origins in any of the original peoples of North America; and/or (e)  Female. SECTION 2.  Section 27-104-7, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 27-104-7.  (1) (a)  There is created the Public Procurement Review Board, which shall be reconstituted on January 1, 2018, and shall be composed of the following members: (i)  Three (3) individuals appointed by the Governor with the advice and consent of the Senate; (ii)  Two (2) individuals appointed by the Lieutenant Governor with the advice and consent of the Senate; and (iii)  The Executive Director of the Department of Finance and Administration, serving as an ex officio and nonvoting member. (b)  The initial terms of each appointee shall be as follows: (i)  One (1) member appointed by the Governor to serve for a term ending on June 30, 2019; (ii)  One (1) member appointed by the Governor to serve for a term ending on June 30, 2020; (iii)  One (1) member appointed by the Governor to serve for a term ending on June 30, 2021; (iv)  One (1) member appointed by the Lieutenant Governor to serve for a term ending on June 30, 2019; and (v)  One (1) member appointed by the Lieutenant Governor to serve for a term ending on June 30, 2020. After the expiration of the initial terms, all appointed members' terms shall be for a period of four (4) years from the expiration date of the previous term, and until such time as the member's successor is duly appointed and qualified. (c)  When appointing members to the Public Procurement Review Board, the Governor and Lieutenant Governor shall take into consideration persons who possess at least five (5) years of management experience in general business, health care or finance for an organization, corporation or other public or private entity.  Any person, or any employee or owner of a company, who receives any grants, procurements or contracts that are subject to approval under this section shall not be appointed to the Public Procurement Review Board.  Any person, or any employee or owner of a company, who is a principal of the source providing a personal or professional service shall not be appointed to the Public Procurement Review Board if the principal owns or controls a greater than five percent (5%) interest or has an ownership value of One Million Dollars ($1,000,000.00) in the source's business, whichever is smaller.  No member shall be an officer or employee of the State of Mississippi while serving as a voting member on the Public Procurement Review Board. (d)  Members of the Public Procurement Review Board shall be entitled to per diem as authorized by Section 25-3-69 and travel reimbursement as authorized by Section 25-3-41. (e)  The members of the Public Procurement Review Board shall elect a chair from among the membership, and he or she shall preside over the meetings of the board.  The board shall annually elect a vice chair, who shall serve in the absence of the chair.  No business shall be transacted, including adoption of rules of procedure, without the presence of a quorum of the board.  Three (3) members shall be a quorum. No action shall be valid unless approved by a majority of the members present and voting, entered upon the minutes of the board and signed by the chair. Necessary clerical and administrative support for the board shall be provided by the Department of Finance and Administration.  Minutes shall be kept of the proceedings of each meeting, copies of which shall be filed on a monthly basis with the chairs of the Accountability, Efficiency and Transparency Committees of the Senate and House of Representatives and the chairs of the Appropriations Committees of the Senate and House of Representatives. (2)  The Public Procurement Review Board shall have the following powers and responsibilities: (a)  Approve all purchasing regulations governing the purchase or lease by any agency, as defined in Section 31-7-1, of commodities and equipment, except computer equipment acquired pursuant to Sections 25-53-1 through 25-53-29; (b)  Adopt regulations governing the approval of contracts let for the construction and maintenance of state buildings and other state facilities as well as related contracts for architectural and engineering services. The provisions of this paragraph (b) shall not apply to such contracts involving buildings and other facilities of state institutions of higher learning which are self-administered as provided under this paragraph (b) or Section 37-101-15(m); (c)  Adopt regulations governing any lease or rental agreement by any state agency or department, including any state agency financed entirely by federal funds, for space outside the buildings under the jurisdiction of the Department of Finance and Administration.  These regulations shall require each agency requesting to lease such space to provide the following information that shall be published by the Department of Finance and Administration on its website:  the agency to lease the space; the terms of the lease; the approximate square feet to be leased; the use for the space; a description of a suitable space; the general location desired for the leased space; the contact information for a person from the agency; the deadline date for the agency to have received a lease proposal; any other specific terms or conditions of the agency; and any other information deemed appropriate by the Division of Real Property Management of the Department of Finance and Administration or the Public Procurement Review Board.  The information shall be provided sufficiently in advance of the time the space is needed to allow the Division of Real Property Management of the Department of Finance and Administration to review and preapprove the lease before the time for advertisement begins; * * *  (d)  Adopt, in its discretion, regulations to set aside at least five percent (5%) of anticipated annual expenditures for the purchase of commodities from minority businesses; however, all such set‑aside purchases shall comply with all purchasing regulations promulgated by the department and shall be subject to all bid requirements.  Set‑aside purchases for which competitive bids are required shall be made from the lowest and best minority business bidder; however, if no minority bid is available or if the minority bid is more than two percent (2%) higher than the lowest bid, then bids shall be accepted and awarded to the lowest and best bidder.  However, the provisions in this paragraph shall not be construed to prohibit the rejection of a bid when only one (1) bid is received.  Such rejection shall be placed in the minutes.  For the purposes of this paragraph, the term "minority business" means a business which is owned by a person who is a citizen or lawful permanent resident of the United States and who is: (i) Black:  having origins in any of the black racial groups of Africa; (ii) Hispanic:  of Mexican, Puerto Rican, Cuban, Central or South American, or other Spanish or Portuguese culture or origin regardless of race; (iii) Asian‑American:  having origins in any of the original people of the Far East, Southeast Asia, the Indian subcontinent, or the Pacific Islands; (iv) American Indian or Alaskan Native:  having origins in any of the original people of North America; or (v) Female; ( * * *ed)  In consultation with and approval by the Chairs of the Senate and House Public Property Committees, approve leases, for a term not to exceed eighteen (18) months, entered into by state agencies for the purpose of providing parking arrangements for state employees who work in the Woolfolk Building, the Carroll Gartin Justice Building or the Walter Sillers Office Building; ( * * *fe)  (i)  Except as otherwise provided in subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, promulgate rules and regulations governing the solicitation and selection of contractual services personnel, including personal and professional services contracts for any form of consulting, policy analysis, public relations, marketing, public affairs, legislative advocacy services or any other contract that the board deems appropriate for oversight, with the exception of: 1.  Any personal service contracts entered into by any agency that employs only nonstate service employees as defined in Section 25-9-107(c); 2.  Any personal service contracts entered into for computer or information technology-related services governed by the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services; 3.  Any personal service contracts entered into by the individual state institutions of higher learning; 4.  Any personal service contracts entered into by the Mississippi Department of Transportation; 5.  Any personal service contracts entered into by the Department of Human Services through June 30, 2019, which the Executive Director of the Department of Human Services determines would be useful in establishing and operating the Department of Child Protection Services; 6.  Any personal service contracts entered into by the Department of Child Protection Services through June 30, 2019; 7.  Any contracts for entertainers and/or performers at the Mississippi State Fairgrounds entered into by the Mississippi Fair Commission; 8.  Any contracts entered into by the Department of Finance and Administration when procuring aircraft maintenance, parts, equipment and/or services; 9.  Any contract entered into by the Department of Public Safety for service on specialized equipment and/or software required for the operation of such specialized equipment for use by the Office of Forensics Laboratories; 10.  Any personal or professional service contract entered into by the Mississippi Department of Health or the Department of Revenue solely in connection with their respective responsibilities under the Mississippi Medical Cannabis Act from February 2, 2022, through June 30, 2026; 11.  Any contract for attorney, accountant, actuary auditor, architect, engineer, anatomical pathologist, or utility rate expert services; 12.  Any personal service contracts approved by the Executive Director of the Department of Finance and Administration and entered into by the Coordinator of Mental Health Accessibility through June 30, 2022; 13.  Any personal or professional services contract entered into by the State Department of Health in carrying out its responsibilities under the ARPA Rural Water Associations Infrastructure Grant Program through June 30, 2026; 14. * * * And  Any personal or professional services contract entered into by the Mississippi Department of Environmental Quality in carrying out its responsibilities under the Mississippi Municipality and County Water Infrastructure Grant Program Act of 2022, through June 30, 2026; 15.  Any personal or professional services contract entered into by an agency for the design, operation or maintenance of museum exhibits.  An agency making a purchase under this exemption shall publicly advertise a Request for Qualifications but shall be otherwise exempt.  Any contracts arising from the use of this exemption must be approved by the Public Procurement Review Board prior to execution by the agency; 16.  Any personal or professional services contract entered into by the Mississippi Department of Environmental Quality in carrying out its responsibilities under Section 49-2-13(l).  This item 16 shall stand repealed on July 1, 2028; and 17.  Any contract entered into by the State Department of Health for service on specialized equipment and/or software required for the operation of such specialized equipment for the use by the Public Health Laboratory. Any such rules and regulations shall provide for maintaining continuous internal audit covering the activities of such agency affecting its revenue and expenditures as required under Section 7-7-3(6)(d).  Any rules and regulation changes related to personal and professional services contracts that the Public Procurement Review Board may propose shall be submitted to the Chairs of the Accountability, Efficiency and Transparency Committees of the Senate and House of Representatives and the Chairs of the Appropriation Committees of the Senate and House of Representatives at least fifteen (15) days before the board votes on the proposed changes, and those rules and regulation changes, if adopted, shall be promulgated in accordance with the Mississippi Administrative Procedures Act. (ii)  From and after July 1, 2024, the Public Procurement Review Board shall promulgate rules and regulations that require the Department of Finance and Administration to conduct personal and professional services solicitations as provided in subparagraph (i) of this paragraph for those services in excess of Seventy-five Thousand Dollars ($75,000.00) for the Department of Marine Resources, the Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks, the Mississippi Emergency Management Agency and the Mississippi Development Authority, with assistance to be provided from these entities.  Any powers that have been conferred upon agencies in order to comply with the provisions of this section for personal and professional services solicitations shall be conferred upon the Department of Finance and Administration to conduct personal and professional services solicitations for the Department of Marine Resources, the Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks, the Mississippi Emergency Management Agency and the Mississippi Development Authority for those services in excess of Seventy-five Thousand Dollars ($75,000.00).  The Department of Finance and Administration shall make any submissions that are required to be made by other agencies to the Public Procurement Review Board for the Department of Marine Resources, the Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks, the Mississippi Emergency Management Agency and the Mississippi Development Authority. The provisions of this subparagraph (ii) shall stand repealed on June 30, 2027; ( * * *gf)  Approve all personal and professional services contracts involving the expenditures of funds in excess of Seventy-five Thousand Dollars ($75,000.00), except as provided in paragraph ( * * *fe) of this subsection (2) and in subsection (8); ( * * *hg)  Develop mandatory standards with respect to contractual services personnel that require invitations for public bid, requests for proposals, record keeping and financial responsibility of contractors.  The Public Procurement Review Board shall, unless exempted under this paragraph ( * * *hg) or under paragraph ( * * *ih) or ( * * *on) of this subsection (2), require the agency involved to submit the procurement to a competitive procurement process, and may reserve the right to reject any or all resulting procurements; ( * * *ih)  Prescribe certain circumstances by which agency heads may enter into contracts for personal and professional services without receiving prior approval from the Public Procurement Review Board.  The Public Procurement Review Board may establish a preapproved list of providers of various personal and professional services for set prices with which state agencies may contract without bidding or prior approval from the board; (i)  Agency requirements may be fulfilled by procuring services performed incident to the state's own programs.  The agency head shall determine in writing whether the price represents a fair market value for the services.  When the procurements are made from other governmental entities, the private sector need not be solicited; however, these contracts shall still be submitted for approval to the Public Procurement Review Board. (ii)  Contracts between two (2) state agencies, both under Public Procurement Review Board purview, shall not require Public Procurement Review Board approval.  However, the contracts shall still be entered into the enterprise resource planning system; ( * * *ji)  Provide standards for the issuance of requests for proposals, the evaluation of proposals received, consideration of costs and quality of services proposed, contract negotiations, the administrative monitoring of contract performance by the agency and successful steps in terminating a contract; ( * * *kj)  Present recommendations for governmental privatization and to evaluate privatization proposals submitted by any state agency; ( * * *lk)  Authorize personal and professional service contracts to be effective for more than one (1) year provided a funding condition is included in any such multiple year contract, except the State Board of Education, which shall have the authority to enter into contractual agreements for student assessment for a period up to ten (10) years.  The State Board of Education shall procure these services in accordance with the Public Procurement Review Board procurement regulations; ( * * *ml)  Request the State Auditor to conduct a performance audit on any personal or professional service contract; ( * * *nm)  Prepare an annual report to the Legislature concerning the issuance of personal and professional services contracts during the previous year, collecting any necessary information from state agencies in making such report; ( * * *on)  Develop and implement the following standards and procedures for the approval of any sole source contract for personal and professional services regardless of the value of the procurement: (i)  For the purposes of this paragraph ( * * *on), the term "sole source" means only one (1) source is available that can provide the required personal or professional service. (ii)  An agency that has been issued a binding, valid court order mandating that a particular source or provider must be used for the required service must include a copy of the applicable court order in all future sole source contract reviews for the particular personal or professional service referenced in the court order. (iii)  Any agency alleging to have a sole source for any personal or professional service, other than those exempted under paragraph ( * * *fe) of this subsection (2) and subsection (8), shall publish on the procurement portal website established by Sections 25-53-151 and 27-104-165, for at least fourteen (14) days, the terms of the proposed contract for those services.  In addition, the publication shall include, but is not limited to, the following information: 1.  The personal or professional service offered in the contract; 2.  An explanation of why the personal or professional service is the only one that can meet the needs of the agency; 3.  An explanation of why the source is the only person or entity that can provide the required personal or professional service; 4.  An explanation of why the amount to be expended for the personal or professional service is reasonable; and 5.  The efforts that the agency went through to obtain the best possible price for the personal or professional service. (iv)  If any person or entity objects and proposes that the personal or professional service published under subparagraph (iii) of this paragraph ( * * *on) is not a sole source service and can be provided by another person or entity, then the objecting person or entity shall notify the Public Procurement Review Board and the agency that published the proposed sole source contract with a detailed explanation of why the personal or professional service is not a sole source service. (v)  1.  If the agency determines after review that the personal or professional service in the proposed sole source contract can be provided by another person or entity, then the agency must withdraw the sole source contract publication from the procurement portal website and submit the procurement of the personal or professional service to an advertised competitive bid or selection process. 2.  If the agency determines after review that there is only one (1) source for the required personal or professional service, then the agency may appeal to the Public Procurement Review Board.  The agency has the burden of proving that the personal or professional service is only provided by one (1) source. 3.  If the Public Procurement Review Board has any reasonable doubt as to whether the personal or professional service can only be provided by one (1) source, then the agency must submit the procurement of the personal or professional service to an advertised competitive bid or selection process.  No action taken by the Public Procurement Review Board in this appeal process shall be valid unless approved by a majority of the members of the Public Procurement Review Board present and voting. (vi)  The Public Procurement Review Board shall prepare and submit a quarterly report to the House of Representatives and Senate Accountability, Efficiency and Transparency Committees that details the sole source contracts presented to the Public Procurement Review Board and the reasons that the Public Procurement Review Board approved or rejected each contract.  These quarterly reports shall also include the documentation and memoranda required in subsection (4) of this section.  An agency that submitted a sole source contract shall be prepared to explain the sole source contract to each committee by December 15 of each year upon request by the committee; and ( * * *po)  Assess any fines and administrative penalties provided for in Sections 31-7-401 through 31-7-423. (3)  All submissions shall be made sufficiently in advance of each monthly meeting of the Public Procurement Review Board as prescribed by the Public Procurement Review Board. If the Public Procurement Review Board rejects any contract submitted for review or approval, the Public Procurement Review Board shall clearly set out the reasons for its action, including, but not limited to, the policy that the agency has violated in its submitted contract and any corrective actions that the agency may take to amend the contract to comply with the rules and regulations of the Public Procurement Review Board. (4)  All sole source contracts for personal and professional services awarded by state agencies, other than those exempted under Section 27-104-7(2)( * * *fe) and (8), whether approved by an agency head or the Public Procurement Review Board, shall contain in the procurement file a written determination for the approval, using a request form furnished by the Public Procurement Review Board.  The written determination shall document the basis for the determination, including any market analysis conducted in order to ensure that the service required was practicably available from only one (1) source.  A memorandum shall accompany the request form and address the following four (4) points: (a)  Explanation of why this service is the only service that can meet the needs of the purchasing agency; (b)  Explanation of why this vendor is the only practicably available source from which to obtain this service; (c)  Explanation of why the price is considered reasonable; and (d)  Description of the efforts that were made to conduct a noncompetitive negotiation to get the best possible price for the taxpayers. (5)  In conjunction with the State Personnel Board, the Public Procurement Review Board shall develop and promulgate rules and regulations to define the allowable legal relationship between contract employees and the contracting departments, agencies and institutions of state government under the jurisdiction of the State Personnel Board, in compliance with the applicable rules and regulations of the federal Internal Revenue Service (IRS) for federal employment tax purposes.  Under these regulations, the usual common law rules are applicable to determine and require that such worker is an independent contractor and not an employee, requiring evidence of lawful behavioral control, lawful financial control and lawful relationship of the parties.  Any state department, agency or institution shall only be authorized to contract for personnel services in compliance with those regulations. (6)  No member of the Public Procurement Review Board shall use his or her official authority or influence to coerce, by threat of discharge from employment, or otherwise, the purchase of commodities, the contracting for personal or professional services, or the contracting for public construction under this chapter. (7)  Notwithstanding any other laws or rules to the contrary, the provisions of subsection (2) of this section shall not be applicable to the Mississippi State Port Authority at Gulfport. (8)  Nothing in this section shall impair or limit the authority of the Board of Trustees of the Public Employees' Retirement System to enter into any personal or professional services contracts directly related to their constitutional obligation to manage the trust funds, including, but not limited to, actuarial, custodial banks, cash management, investment consultant and investment management contracts. Nothing in this section shall impair or limit the authority of the State Treasurer to enter into any personal or professional services contracts involving the management of trust funds, including, but not limited to, actuarial, custodial banks, cash management, investment consultant and investment management contracts. (9)  Through December 31, 2026, the provisions of this section related to rental agreements or leasing of real property for the purpose of conducting agency business shall not apply to the Office of Workforce Development created in Section 37-153-7. SECTION 3.  Section 31-7-13, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 31-7-13.  All agencies and governing authorities shall purchase their commodities and printing; contract for garbage collection or disposal; contract for solid waste collection or disposal; contract for sewage collection or disposal; contract for public construction; and contract for rentals as herein provided. (a)  Bidding procedure for purchases not over $5,000.00.  Purchases which do not involve an expenditure of more than Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00), exclusive of freight or shipping charges, may be made without advertising or otherwise requesting competitive bids.  However, nothing contained in this paragraph (a) shall be construed to prohibit any agency or governing authority from establishing procedures which require competitive bids on purchases of Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) or less. (b)  Bidding procedure for purchases over $5,000.00 but not over $75,000.00.  Purchases which involve an expenditure of more than Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) but not more than Seventy-five Thousand Dollars ($75,000.00), exclusive of freight and shipping charges, may be made from the lowest and best bidder without publishing or posting advertisement for bids, provided at least two (2) competitive written bids have been obtained.  Any state agency or community or junior college purchasing commodities or procuring construction pursuant to this paragraph (b) may authorize its purchasing agent, or his or her designee, to accept the lowest competitive written bid under Seventy-five Thousand Dollars ($75,000.00).  Any governing authority purchasing commodities pursuant to this paragraph (b) may authorize its purchasing agent, or his or her designee, with regard to governing authorities other than counties, or its purchase clerk, or his or her designee, with regard to counties, to accept the lowest and best competitive written bid.  Such authorization shall be made in writing by the governing authority and shall be maintained on file in the primary office of the agency and recorded in the official minutes of the governing authority, as appropriate.  The purchasing agent or the purchase clerk, or his or her designee, as the case may be, and not the governing authority, shall be liable for any penalties and/or damages as may be imposed by law for any act or omission of the purchasing agent or purchase clerk, or his or her designee, constituting a violation of law in accepting any bid without approval by the governing authority.  The term "competitive written bid" shall mean a bid submitted on a bid form furnished by the buying agency or governing authority and signed by authorized personnel representing the vendor, or a bid submitted on a vendor's letterhead or identifiable bid form and signed by authorized personnel representing the vendor.  "Competitive" shall mean that the bids are developed based upon comparable identification of the needs and are developed independently and without knowledge of other bids or prospective bids.  Any bid item for construction in excess of Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) shall be broken down by components to provide detail of component description and pricing. These details shall be submitted with the written bids and become part of the bid evaluation criteria.  Bids may be submitted by facsimile, electronic mail or other generally accepted method of information distribution.  Bids submitted by electronic transmission shall not require the signature of the vendor's representative unless required by agencies or governing authorities. (c)  Bidding procedure for purchases over $75,000.00. (i)  Publication requirement. 1. Purchases which involve an expenditure of more than Seventy-five Thousand Dollars ($75,000.00), exclusive of freight and shipping charges, may be made from the lowest and best bidder after advertising for competitive bids once each week for two (2) consecutive weeks in a regular newspaper published in the county or municipality in which such agency or governing authority is located. However, all American Recovery and Reinvestment Act projects in excess of Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00) shall be bid.  All references to American Recovery and Reinvestment Act projects in this section shall not apply to programs identified in Division B of the American Recovery and Reinvestment Act. 2.  Reverse auctions shall be the primary method for receiving bids during the bidding process.  If a purchasing entity determines that a reverse auction is not in the best interest of the state, then that determination must be approved by the Public Procurement Review Board.  The purchasing entity shall submit a detailed explanation of why a reverse auction would not be in the best interest of the state and present an alternative process to be approved by the Public Procurement Review Board.  If the Public Procurement Review Board authorizes the purchasing entity to solicit bids with a method other than reverse auction, then the purchasing entity may designate the other methods by which the bids will be received, including, but not limited to, bids sealed in an envelope, bids received electronically in a secure system, or bids received by any other method that promotes open competition and has been approved by the Office of Purchasing and Travel.  However, reverse auction shall not be used for any public contract for design, construction, improvement, repair or remodeling of any public facilities, including the purchase of materials, supplies, equipment or goods for same and including buildings, roads and bridges.  The Public Procurement Review Board must approve any contract entered into by alternative process.  The provisions of this item 2 shall not apply to the individual state institutions of higher learning.  The provisions of this item 2 requiring reverse auction as the primary method of receiving bids shall not apply to term contract purchases as provided in paragraph (n) of this section; however, a purchasing entity may, in its discretion, utilize reverse auction for such purchases.  The provisions of this item 2 shall not apply to individual public schools, including public charter schools and public school districts, only when purchasing copyrighted educational supplemental materials and software as a service product.  For such purchases, a local school board may authorize a purchasing entity in its jurisdiction to use a Request for Qualifications which promotes open competition and meets the requirements of the Office of Purchasing and Travel. 3.  The date as published for the bid opening shall not be less than seven (7) working days after the last published notice; however, if the purchase involves a construction project in which the estimated cost is in excess of Seventy-five Thousand Dollars ($75,000.00), such bids shall not be opened in less than fifteen (15) working days after the last notice is published and the notice for the purchase of such construction shall be published once each week for two (2) consecutive weeks.   The notice of intention to let contracts or purchase equipment shall state the time and place at which bids shall be received, list the contracts to be made or types of equipment or supplies to be purchased, and, if all plans and/or specifications are not published, refer to the plans and/or specifications on file.  If there is no newspaper published in the county or municipality, then such notice shall be given by posting same at the courthouse, or for municipalities at the city hall, and at two (2) other public places in the county or municipality, and also by publication once each week for two (2) consecutive weeks in some newspaper having a general circulation in the county or municipality in the above-provided manner.  On the same date that the notice is submitted to the newspaper for publication, the agency or governing authority involved shall mail written notice to, or provide electronic notification to the main office of the Mississippi Procurement Technical Assistance Program under the Mississippi Development Authority that contains the same information as that in the published notice.  Within one (1) working day of the contract award, the agency or governing authority shall post to the designated web page maintained by the Department of Finance and Administration, notice of the award, including the award recipient, the contract amount, and a brief summary of the contract in accordance with rules promulgated by the department.  Within one (1) working day of the contract execution, the agency or governing authority shall post to the designated web page maintained by the Department of Finance and Administration a summary of the executed contract and make a copy of the appropriately redacted contract documents available for linking to the designated web page in accordance with the rules promulgated by the department.  The information provided by the agency or governing authority shall be posted to the web page until the project is completed. 4.  Agencies and governing authorities using federal funds for the procurement of any good or service, including exempt personal and professional services, must comply with the Uniform Administrative Requirements, Cost Principles, and Audit Requirements for Federal Awards - Subpart D - Post Federal Award Requirements Procurement Standards, in accordance with 2 CFR 200.317 through 2 CFR 200.327. (ii)  Bidding process amendment procedure.  If all plans and/or specifications are published in the notification, then the plans and/or specifications may not be amended.  If all plans and/or specifications are not published in the notification, then amendments to the plans/specifications, bid opening date, bid opening time and place may be made, provided that the agency or governing authority maintains a list of all prospective bidders who are known to have received a copy of the bid documents and all such prospective bidders are sent copies of all amendments.  This notification of amendments may be made via mail, facsimile, electronic mail or other generally accepted method of information distribution.  No addendum to bid specifications may be issued within two (2) working days of the time established for the receipt of bids unless such addendum also amends the bid opening to a date not less than five (5) working days after the date of the addendum. (iii)  Filing requirement.  In all cases involving governing authorities, before the notice shall be published or posted, the plans or specifications for the construction or equipment being sought shall be filed with the clerk of the board of the governing authority.  In addition to these requirements, a bid file shall be established which shall indicate those vendors to whom such solicitations and specifications were issued, and such file shall also contain such information as is pertinent to the bid. (iv)  Specification restrictions. 1. Specifications pertinent to such bidding shall be written so as not to exclude comparable equipment of domestic manufacture.  However, if valid justification is presented, the Department of Finance and Administration or the board of a governing authority may approve a request for specific equipment necessary to perform a specific job.  Further, such justification, when placed on the minutes of the board of a governing authority, may serve as authority for that governing authority to write specifications to require a specific item of equipment needed to perform a specific job.  In addition to these requirements, from and after July 1, 1990, vendors of relocatable classrooms and the specifications for the purchase of such relocatable classrooms published by local school boards shall meet all pertinent regulations of the State Board of Education, including prior approval of such bid by the State Department of Education. 2. Specifications for construction projects may include an allowance for commodities, equipment, furniture, construction materials or systems in which prospective bidders are instructed to include in their bids specified amounts for such items so long as the allowance items are acquired by the vendor in a commercially reasonable manner and approved by the agency/governing authority. Such acquisitions shall not be made to circumvent the public purchasing laws. (v)  Electronic bids.  Agencies and governing authorities shall provide a secure electronic interactive system for the submittal of bids requiring competitive bidding that shall be an additional bidding option for those bidders who choose to submit their bids electronically.  The Department of Finance and Administration shall provide, by regulation, the standards that agencies must follow when receiving electronic bids.  Agencies and governing authorities shall make the appropriate provisions necessary to accept electronic bids from those bidders who choose to submit their bids electronically for all purchases requiring competitive bidding under this section.  Any special condition or requirement for the electronic bid submission shall be specified in the advertisement for bids required by this section.  Agencies or governing authorities that are currently without available high speed Internet access shall be exempt from the requirement of this subparagraph (v) until such time that high speed Internet access becomes available.  Any county having a population of less than twenty thousand (20,000) shall be exempt from the provisions of this subparagraph (v).  Any municipality having a population of less than ten thousand (10,000) shall be exempt from the provisions of this subparagraph (v).  The provisions of this subparagraph (v) shall not require any bidder to submit bids electronically.  When construction bids are submitted electronically, the requirement for including a certificate of responsibility, or a statement that the bid enclosed does not exceed Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00), on the exterior of the bid envelope as indicated in Section 31-3-21(1) and (2) shall be deemed in compliance with by including same as an attachment with the electronic bid submittal. (d)  Lowest and best bid decision procedure. (i)  Decision procedure.  Purchases may be made from the lowest and best bidder.  In determining the lowest and best bid, freight and shipping charges shall be included.  Life-cycle costing, total cost bids, warranties, guaranteed buy-back provisions and other relevant provisions may be included in the best bid calculation.  All best bid procedures for state agencies must be in compliance with regulations established by the Department of Finance and Administration. If any governing authority accepts a bid other than the lowest bid actually submitted, it shall place on its minutes detailed calculations and narrative summary showing that the accepted bid was determined to be the lowest and best bid, including the dollar amount of the accepted bid and the dollar amount of the lowest bid.  No agency or governing authority shall accept a bid based on items not included in the specifications. (ii)  Decision procedure for Certified Purchasing Offices.  In addition to the decision procedure set forth in subparagraph (i) of this paragraph (d), Certified Purchasing Offices may also use the following procedure:  Purchases may be made from the bidder offering the best value.  In determining the best value bid, freight and shipping charges shall be included.  Life-cycle costing, total cost bids, warranties, guaranteed buy-back provisions, documented previous experience, training costs and other relevant provisions, including, but not limited to, a bidder having a local office and inventory located within the jurisdiction of the governing authority, may be included in the best value calculation.  This provision shall authorize Certified Purchasing Offices to utilize a Request For Proposals (RFP) process when purchasing commodities.  All best value procedures for state agencies must be in compliance with regulations established by the Department of Finance and Administration.  No agency or governing authority shall accept a bid based on items or criteria not included in the specifications. (iii)  Decision procedure for Prequalified Construction.  In addition to the decision procedure set forth in subparagraph (i) of this paragraph (d), where purchase involves renovation, restoration, or both, of the State Capitol Building or any other historical building designated for at least five (5) years as a Mississippi Landmark by the Board of Trustees of the Department of Archives and History under the authority of Sections 39-7-7 and 39-7-11, or for any other construction procurement with a minimum construction cost of Ten Million Dollars ($10,000,000.00) where the agency or governing authority has determined that prequalification of bidders is in the best interest of the state, the agency or governing authority may use the following procedure:  Purchases may be made from the lowest and best prequalified bidder.  Solicitation of the prequalification of bidders shall be in accordance with paragraph (c) of this section and shall be determined not less than fifteen (15) working days before the prequalified bidders are invited to submit bids.  Prequalification criteria shall be limited to bidder's and proposed sub-contractor's knowledge and experience on projects of similar size and scope, past performance, project management team and financial stability.  All best bid and prequalification procedures for state agencies must be in compliance with regulations established by the Department of Finance and Administration.  If any governing authority accepts a bid other than the lowest bid actually submitted, it shall place on its minutes detailed calculations and narrative summary showing that the accepted bid was determined to be the lowest and best bid, including the dollar amount of the accepted bid and the dollar amount of the lowest bid.  No agency or governing authority shall accept a bid based on items not included in the specifications. (iv)  Construction project negotiations authority.  If the lowest and best bid is not more than ten percent (10%) above the amount of funds allocated for a public construction or renovation project, then the agency or governing authority shall be permitted to negotiate with the lowest bidder in order to enter into a contract for an amount not to exceed the funds allocated. (e)  Lease-purchase authorization.  For the purposes of this section, the term "equipment" shall mean equipment, furniture and, if applicable, associated software and other applicable direct costs associated with the acquisition.  Any lease-purchase of equipment which an agency is not required to lease-purchase under the master lease-purchase program pursuant to Section 31-7-10 and any lease-purchase of equipment which a governing authority elects to lease-purchase may be acquired by a lease-purchase agreement under this paragraph (e).  Lease-purchase financing may also be obtained from the vendor or from a third-party source after having solicited and obtained at least two (2) written competitive bids, as defined in paragraph (b) of this section, for such financing without advertising for such bids.  Solicitation for the bids for financing may occur before or after acceptance of bids for the purchase of such equipment or, where no such bids for purchase are required, at any time before the purchase thereof.  No such lease-purchase agreement shall be for an annual rate of interest which is greater than the overall maximum interest rate to maturity on general obligation indebtedness permitted under Section 75-17-101, and the term of such lease-purchase agreement shall not exceed the useful life of equipment covered thereby as determined according to the upper limit of the asset depreciation range (ADR) guidelines for the Class Life Asset Depreciation Range System established by the Internal Revenue Service pursuant to the United States Internal Revenue Code and regulations thereunder as in effect on December 31, 1980, or comparable depreciation guidelines with respect to any equipment not covered by ADR guidelines.  Any lease-purchase agreement entered into pursuant to this paragraph (e) may contain any of the terms and conditions which a master lease-purchase agreement may contain under the provisions of Section 31-7-10(5), and shall contain an annual allocation dependency clause substantially similar to that set forth in Section 31-7-10(8).  Each agency or governing authority entering into a lease-purchase transaction pursuant to this paragraph (e) shall maintain with respect to each such lease-purchase transaction the same information as required to be maintained by the Department of Finance and Administration pursuant to Section 31-7-10(13).  However, nothing contained in this section shall be construed to permit agencies to acquire items of equipment with a total acquisition cost in the aggregate of less than Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00) by a single lease-purchase transaction.  All equipment, and the purchase thereof by any lessor, acquired by lease-purchase under this paragraph and all lease-purchase payments with respect thereto shall be exempt from all Mississippi sales, use and ad valorem taxes.  Interest paid on any lease-purchase agreement under this section shall be exempt from State of Mississippi income taxation. (f)  Alternate bid authorization.  When necessary to ensure ready availability of commodities for public works and the timely completion of public projects, no more than two (2) alternate bids may be accepted by a governing authority for commodities. No purchases may be made through use of such alternate bids procedure unless the lowest and best bidder cannot deliver the commodities contained in his bid.  In that event, purchases of such commodities may be made from one (1) of the bidders whose bid was accepted as an alternate. (g)  Construction contract change authorization.  In the event a determination is made by an agency or governing authority after a construction contract is let that changes or modifications to the original contract are necessary or would better serve the purpose of the agency or the governing authority, such agency or governing authority may, in its discretion, order such changes pertaining to the construction that are necessary under the circumstances without the necessity of further public bids; provided that such change shall be made in a commercially reasonable manner and shall not be made to circumvent the public purchasing statutes.  In addition to any other authorized person, the architect or engineer hired by an agency or governing authority with respect to any public construction contract shall have the authority, when granted by an agency or governing authority, to authorize changes or modifications to the original contract without the necessity of prior approval of the agency or governing authority when any such change or modification is less than one percent (1%) of the total contract amount.  The agency or governing authority may limit the number, manner or frequency of such emergency changes or modifications. (h)  Petroleum purchase alternative.  In addition to other methods of purchasing authorized in this chapter, when any agency or governing authority shall have a need for gas, diesel fuel, oils and/or other petroleum products in excess of the amount set forth in paragraph (a) of this section, such agency or governing authority may purchase the commodity after having solicited and obtained at least two (2) competitive written bids, as defined in paragraph (b) of this section.  If two (2) competitive written bids are not obtained, the entity shall comply with the procedures set forth in paragraph (c) of this section.  In the event any agency or governing authority shall have advertised for bids for the purchase of gas, diesel fuel, oils and other petroleum products and coal and no acceptable bids can be obtained, such agency or governing authority is authorized and directed to enter into any negotiations necessary to secure the lowest and best contract available for the purchase of such commodities. (i)  Road construction petroleum products price adjustment clause authorization.  Any agency or governing authority authorized to enter into contracts for the construction, maintenance, surfacing or repair of highways, roads or streets, may include in its bid proposal and contract documents a price adjustment clause with relation to the cost to the contractor, including taxes, based upon an industry-wide cost index, of petroleum products including asphalt used in the performance or execution of the contract or in the production or manufacture of materials for use in such performance.  Such industry-wide index shall be established and published monthly by the Mississippi Department of Transportation with a copy thereof to be mailed, upon request, to the clerks of the governing authority of each municipality and the clerks of each board of supervisors throughout the state.  The price adjustment clause shall be based on the cost of such petroleum products only and shall not include any additional profit or overhead as part of the adjustment.  The bid proposals or document contract shall contain the basis and methods of adjusting unit prices for the change in the cost of such petroleum products. (j)  State agency emergency purchase procedure.  If the governing board or the executive head, or his or her designees, of any agency of the state shall determine that an emergency exists in regard to the purchase of any commodities or repair contracts, so that the delay incident to giving opportunity for competitive bidding would be detrimental to the interests of the state, then the head of such agency, or his or her designees, shall file with the Department of Finance and Administration (i) a statement explaining the conditions and circumstances of the emergency, which shall include a detailed description of the events leading up to the situation and the negative impact to the entity if the purchase is made following the statutory requirements set forth in paragraph (a), (b) or (c) of this section, and (ii) a certified copy of the appropriate minutes of the board of such agency requesting the emergency purchase, if applicable.  Upon receipt of the statement and applicable board certification, the State Fiscal Officer, or his or her designees, may, in writing, authorize the purchase or repair without having to comply with competitive bidding requirements. If the governing board or the executive head, or his or her designees, of any agency determines that an emergency exists in regard to the purchase of any commodities or repair contracts, so that the delay incident to giving opportunity for competitive bidding would threaten the health or safety of any person, or the preservation or protection of property, then the provisions in this section for competitive bidding shall not apply, and any officer or agent of the agency having general or specific authority for making the purchase or repair contract shall approve the bill presented for payment, and he or she shall certify in writing from whom the purchase was made, or with whom the repair contract was made. Total purchases made under this paragraph (j) shall only be for the purpose of meeting needs created by the emergency situation.  Following the emergency purchase, documentation of the purchase, including a description of the commodity purchased, the purchase price thereof and the nature of the emergency shall be filed with the Department of Finance and Administration.  Any contract awarded pursuant to this paragraph (j) shall not exceed a term of one (1) year. Purchases under the grant program established under Section 37-68-7 in response to COVID-19 and the directive that school districts create a distance learning plan and fulfill technology needs expeditiously shall be deemed an emergency purchase for purposes of this paragraph (j). (k)  Governing authority emergency purchase procedure.  If the governing authority, or the governing authority acting through its designee, shall determine that an emergency exists in regard to the purchase of any commodities or repair contracts, so that the delay incident to giving opportunity for competitive bidding would be detrimental to the interest of the governing authority, then the provisions herein for competitive bidding shall not apply and any officer or agent of such governing authority having general or special authority therefor in making such purchase or repair shall approve the bill presented therefor, and he or she shall certify in writing thereon from whom such purchase was made, or with whom such a repair contract was made.  At the board meeting next following the emergency purchase or repair contract, documentation of the purchase or repair contract, including a description of the commodity purchased, the price thereof and the nature of the emergency shall be presented to the board and shall be placed on the minutes of the board of such governing authority.  Purchases under the grant program established under Section 37-68-7 in response to COVID-19 and the directive that school districts create a distance learning plan and fulfill technology needs expeditiously shall be deemed an emergency purchase for purposes of this paragraph (k). (l)  Hospital purchase, lease-purchase and lease authorization. (i)  The commissioners or board of trustees of any public hospital may contract with such lowest and best bidder for the purchase or lease-purchase of any commodity under a contract of purchase or lease-purchase agreement whose obligatory payment terms do not exceed five (5) years. (ii)  In addition to the authority granted in subparagraph (i) of this paragraph (l), the commissioners or board of trustees is authorized to enter into contracts for the lease of equipment or services, or both, which it considers necessary for the proper care of patients if, in its opinion, it is not financially feasible to purchase the necessary equipment or services.  Any such contract for the lease of equipment or services executed by the commissioners or board shall not exceed a maximum of five (5) years' duration and shall include a cancellation clause based on unavailability of funds.  If such cancellation clause is exercised, there shall be no further liability on the part of the lessee.  Any such contract for the lease of equipment or services executed on behalf of the commissioners or board that complies with the provisions of this subparagraph (ii) shall be excepted from the bid requirements set forth in this section. (m)  Exceptions from bidding requirements.  Excepted from bid requirements are: (i)  Purchasing agreements approved by department.  Purchasing agreements, contracts and maximum price regulations executed or approved by the Department of Finance and Administration. (ii)  Outside equipment repairs.  Repairs to equipment, when such repairs are made by repair facilities in the private sector; however, engines, transmissions, rear axles and/or other such components shall not be included in this exemption when replaced as a complete unit instead of being repaired and the need for such total component replacement is known before disassembly of the component; however, invoices identifying the equipment, specific repairs made, parts identified by number and name, supplies used in such repairs, and the number of hours of labor and costs therefor shall be required for the payment for such repairs. (iii)  In-house equipment repairs.  Purchases of parts for repairs to equipment, when such repairs are made by personnel of the agency or governing authority; however, entire assemblies, such as engines or transmissions, shall not be included in this exemption when the entire assembly is being replaced instead of being repaired. (iv)  Raw gravel or dirt.  Raw unprocessed deposits of gravel or fill dirt which are to be removed and transported by the purchaser. (v)  Governmental equipment auctions.  Motor vehicles or other equipment purchased from a federal agency or authority, another governing authority or state agency of the State of Mississippi, or any governing authority or state agency of another state at a public auction held for the purpose of disposing of such vehicles or other equipment.  Any purchase by a governing authority under the exemption authorized by this subparagraph (v) shall require advance authorization spread upon the minutes of the governing authority to include the listing of the item or items authorized to be purchased and the maximum bid authorized to be paid for each item or items. (vi)  Intergovernmental sales and transfers.  Purchases, sales, transfers or trades by governing authorities or state agencies when such purchases, sales, transfers or trades are made by a private treaty agreement or through means of negotiation, from any federal agency or authority, another governing authority or state agency of the State of Mississippi, or any state agency or governing authority of another state.  Nothing in this section shall permit such purchases through public auction except as provided for in subparagraph (v) of this paragraph (m).  It is the intent of this section to allow governmental entities to dispose of and/or purchase commodities from other governmental entities at a price that is agreed to by both parties.  This shall allow for purchases and/or sales at prices which may be determined to be below the market value if the selling entity determines that the sale at below market value is in the best interest of the taxpayers of the state.  Governing authorities shall place the terms of the agreement and any justification on the minutes, and state agencies shall obtain approval from the Department of Finance and Administration, prior to releasing or taking possession of the commodities. (vii)  Perishable supplies or food.  Perishable supplies or food purchased for use in connection with hospitals, the school lunch programs, homemaking programs and for the feeding of county or municipal prisoners. (viii)  Single-source items.  Noncompetitive items available from one (1) source only.  In connection with the purchase of noncompetitive items only available from one (1) source, a certification of the conditions and circumstances requiring the purchase shall be filed by the agency with the Department of Finance and Administration and by the governing authority with the board of the governing authority.  Upon receipt of that certification the Department of Finance and Administration or the board of the governing authority, as the case may be, may, in writing, authorize the purchase, which authority shall be noted on the minutes of the body at the next regular meeting thereafter.  In those situations, a governing authority is not required to obtain the approval of the Department of Finance and Administration.  Following the purchase, the executive head of the state agency, or his or her designees, shall file with the Department of Finance and Administration, documentation of the purchase, including a description of the commodity purchased, the purchase price thereof and the source from whom it was purchased. (ix)  Waste disposal facility construction contracts.  Construction of incinerators and other facilities for disposal of solid wastes in which products either generated therein, such as steam, or recovered therefrom, such as materials for recycling, are to be sold or otherwise disposed of; however, in constructing such facilities, a governing authority or agency shall publicly issue requests for proposals, advertised for in the same manner as provided herein for seeking bids for public construction projects, concerning the design, construction, ownership, operation and/or maintenance of such facilities, wherein such requests for proposals when issued shall contain terms and conditions relating to price, financial responsibility, technology, environmental compatibility, legal responsibilities and such other matters as are determined by the governing authority or agency to be appropriate for inclusion; and after responses to the request for proposals have been duly received, the governing authority or agency may select the most qualified proposal or proposals on the basis of price, technology and other relevant factors and from such proposals, but not limited to the terms thereof, negotiate and enter contracts with one or more of the persons or firms submitting proposals. (x)  Hospital group purchase contracts.  Supplies, commodities and equipment purchased by hospitals through group purchase programs pursuant to Section 31-7-38. (xi)  Information technology products.  Purchases of information technology products made by governing authorities under the provisions of purchase schedules, or contracts executed or approved by the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services and designated for use by governing authorities. (xii)  Energy efficiency services and equipment.  Energy efficiency services and equipment acquired by school districts, community and junior colleges, institutions of higher learning and state agencies or other applicable governmental entities on a shared-savings, lease or lease-purchase basis pursuant to Section 31-7-14. (xiii)  Municipal electrical utility system fuel.  Purchases of coal and/or natural gas by municipally owned electric power generating systems that have the capacity to use both coal and natural gas for the generation of electric power. (xiv)  Library books and other reference materials.  Purchases by libraries or for libraries of books and periodicals; processed film, videocassette tapes, filmstrips and slides; recorded audiotapes, cassettes and diskettes; and any such items as would be used for teaching, research or other information distribution; however, equipment such as projectors, recorders, audio or video equipment, and monitor televisions are not exempt under this subparagraph. (xv)  Unmarked vehicles.  Purchases of unmarked vehicles when such purchases are made in accordance with purchasing regulations adopted by the Department of Finance and Administration pursuant to Section 31-7-9(2). (xvi)  Election ballots.  Purchases of ballots printed pursuant to Section 23-15-351. (xvii)  Multichannel interactive video systems.  From and after July 1, 1990, contracts by Mississippi Authority for Educational Television with any private educational institution or private nonprofit organization whose purposes are educational in regard to the construction, purchase, lease or lease-purchase of facilities and equipment and the employment of personnel for providing multichannel interactive video systems (ITSF) in the school districts of this state. (xviii)  Purchases of prison industry products by the Department of Corrections, regional correctional facilities or privately owned prisons.  Purchases made by the Mississippi Department of Corrections, regional correctional facilities or privately owned prisons involving any item that is manufactured, processed, grown or produced from the state's prison industries. (xix)  Undercover operations equipment.  Purchases of surveillance equipment or any other high-tech equipment to be used by law enforcement agents in undercover operations, provided that any such purchase shall be in compliance with regulations established by the Department of Finance and Administration. (xx)  Junior college books for rent.  Purchases by community or junior colleges of textbooks which are obtained for the purpose of renting such books to students as part of a book service system. (xxi)  Certain school district purchases.  Purchases of commodities made by school districts from vendors with which any levying authority of the school district, as defined in Section 37-57-1, has contracted through competitive bidding procedures for purchases of the same commodities. (xxii)  Garbage, solid waste and sewage contracts.  Contracts for garbage collection or disposal, contracts for solid waste collection or disposal and contracts for sewage collection or disposal. (xxiii)  Municipal water tank maintenance contracts.  Professional maintenance program contracts for the repair or maintenance of municipal water tanks, which provide professional services needed to maintain municipal water storage tanks for a fixed annual fee for a duration of two (2) or more years. (xxiv)  Purchases of Mississippi Industries for the Blind products or services.  Purchases made by state agencies or governing authorities involving any item that is manufactured, processed or produced by, or any services provided by, the Mississippi Industries for the Blind. (xxv)  Purchases of state-adopted textbooks.  Purchases of state-adopted textbooks by public school districts. (xxvi)  Certain purchases under the Mississippi Major Economic Impact Act.  Contracts entered into pursuant to the provisions of Section 57-75-9(2), (3) and (4). (xxvii)  Used heavy or specialized machinery or equipment for installation of soil and water conservation practices purchased at auction.  Used heavy or specialized machinery or equipment used for the installation and implementation of soil and water conservation practices or measures purchased subject to the restrictions provided in Sections 69-27-331 through 69-27-341.  Any purchase by the State Soil and Water Conservation Commission under the exemption authorized by this subparagraph shall require advance authorization spread upon the minutes of the commission to include the listing of the item or items authorized to be purchased and the maximum bid authorized to be paid for each item or items. (xxviii)  Hospital lease of equipment or services.  Leases by hospitals of equipment or services if the leases are in compliance with paragraph (l)(ii). (xxix)  Purchases made pursuant to qualified cooperative purchasing agreements.  Purchases made by certified purchasing offices of state agencies or governing authorities under cooperative purchasing agreements previously approved by the Office of Purchasing and Travel and established by or for any municipality, county, parish or state government or the federal government, provided that the notification to potential contractors includes a clause that sets forth the availability of the cooperative purchasing agreement to other governmental entities.  Such purchases shall only be made if the use of the cooperative purchasing agreements is determined to be in the best interest of the governmental entity. (xxx)  School yearbooks.  Purchases of school yearbooks by state agencies or governing authorities; however, state agencies and governing authorities shall use for these purchases the RFP process as set forth in the Mississippi Procurement Manual adopted by the Office of Purchasing and Travel. (xxxi)  Design-build method of contracting and certain other contracts.  Contracts entered into under the provisions of Section 31-7-13.1, 37-101-44 or 65-1-85. (xxxii)  Toll roads and bridge construction projects.  Contracts entered into under the provisions of Section 65-43-1 or 65-43-3. (xxxiii)  Certain purchases under Section 57-1-221.  Contracts entered into pursuant to the provisions of Section 57-1-221. (xxxiv)  Certain transfers made pursuant to the provisions of Section 57-105-1(7). Transfers of public property or facilities under Section 57-105-1(7) and construction related to such public property or facilities. (xxxv)  Certain purchases or transfers entered into with local electrical power associations. Contracts or agreements entered into under the provisions of Section 55-3-33. (xxxvi)  Certain purchases by an academic medical center or health sciences school.  Purchases by an academic medical center or health sciences school, as defined in Section 37-115-50, of commodities that are used for clinical purposes and 1. intended for use in the diagnosis of disease or other conditions or in the cure, mitigation, treatment or prevention of disease, and 2. medical devices, biological, drugs and radiation-emitting devices as defined by the United States Food and Drug Administration. (xxxvii)  Certain purchases made under the Alyce G. Clarke Mississippi Lottery Law. Contracts made by the Mississippi Lottery Corporation pursuant to the Alyce G. Clarke Mississippi Lottery Law. (xxxviii)  Certain purchases made by the Department of Health and the Department of Revenue. Purchases made by the Department of Health and the Department of Revenue solely for the purpose of fulfilling their respective responsibilities under the Mississippi Medical Cannabis Act.  This subparagraph shall stand repealed on June 30, 2026. (xxxix) Purchases made by state agencies related to museum exhibits.  Purchases made by an agency related to the fabrication, construction, installation or refurbishing of museum exhibits.  An agency making a purchase under this exemption in excess of the bid threshold set forth in paragraph (c) of this section shall publicly advertise a Request for Qualifications or Request for Proposals in which price as an evaluation factor is at least twenty percent (20%) out of the one hundred percent (100%) total weight, but shall be otherwise exempt.  Any contract arising from a purchase using this exemption must be approved by the Public Procurement Review Board prior to execution by the agency.  The agency shall submit a written report on December 1 of each year to the Chairs of the Senate and House Appropriations Committees, the Chairs of the Senate and House Accountability, Efficiency and Transparency Committees and the Chair of the Public Procurement Review Board, identifying all purchases made by the agency using this exemption in which the cost of the option selected by the agency was more than twenty-five percent (25%) higher than the lowest cost option available. (n)  Term contract authorization.  All contracts for the purchase of: (i)  All contracts for the purchase of commodities, equipment and public construction (including, but not limited to, repair and maintenance), may be let for periods of not more than sixty (60) months in advance, subject to applicable statutory provisions prohibiting the letting of contracts during specified periods near the end of terms of office.  Term contracts for a period exceeding twenty-four (24) months shall also be subject to ratification or cancellation by governing authority boards taking office subsequent to the governing authority board entering the contract. (ii)  Bid proposals and contracts may include price adjustment clauses with relation to the cost to the contractor based upon a nationally published industry-wide or nationally published and recognized cost index.  The cost index used in a price adjustment clause shall be determined by the Department of Finance and Administration for the state agencies and by the governing board for governing authorities.  The bid proposal and contract documents utilizing a price adjustment clause shall contain the basis and method of adjusting unit prices for the change in the cost of such commodities, equipment and public construction. (o)  Purchase law violation prohibition and vendor penalty.  No contract or purchase as herein authorized shall be made for the purpose of circumventing the provisions of this section requiring competitive bids, nor shall it be lawful for any person or concern to submit individual invoices for amounts within those authorized for a contract or purchase where the actual value of the contract or commodity purchased exceeds the authorized amount and the invoices therefor are split so as to appear to be authorized as purchases for which competitive bids are not required.  Submission of such invoices shall constitute a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not less than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) nor more than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00), or by imprisonment for thirty (30) days in the county jail, or both such fine and imprisonment.  In addition, the claim or claims submitted shall be forfeited. (p)  Electrical utility petroleum-based equipment purchase procedure.  When in response to a proper advertisement therefor, no bid firm as to price is submitted to an electric utility for power transformers, distribution transformers, power breakers, reclosers or other articles containing a petroleum product, the electric utility may accept the lowest and best bid therefor although the price is not firm. (q)  Fuel management system bidding procedure.  Any governing authority or agency of the state shall, before contracting for the services and products of a fuel management or fuel access system, enter into negotiations with not fewer than two (2) sellers of fuel management or fuel access systems for competitive written bids to provide the services and products for the systems.  In the event that the governing authority or agency cannot locate two (2) sellers of such systems or cannot obtain bids from two (2) sellers of such systems, it shall show proof that it made a diligent, good-faith effort to locate and negotiate with two (2) sellers of such systems.  Such proof shall include, but not be limited to, publications of a request for proposals and letters soliciting negotiations and bids.  For purposes of this paragraph (q), a fuel management or fuel access system is an automated system of acquiring fuel for vehicles as well as management reports detailing fuel use by vehicles and drivers, and the term "competitive written bid" shall have the meaning as defined in paragraph (b) of this section.  Governing authorities and agencies shall be exempt from this process when contracting for the services and products of fuel management or fuel access systems under the terms of a state contract established by the Office of Purchasing and Travel. (r)  Solid waste contract proposal procedure.  Before entering into any contract for garbage collection or disposal, contract for solid waste collection or disposal or contract for sewage collection or disposal, which involves an expenditure of more than Seventy-five Thousand Dollars ($75,000.00), a governing authority or agency shall issue publicly a request for proposals concerning the specifications for such services which shall be advertised for in the same manner as provided in this section for seeking bids for purchases which involve an expenditure of more than the amount provided in paragraph (c) of this section.  Any request for proposals when issued shall contain terms and conditions relating to price, financial responsibility, technology, legal responsibilities and other relevant factors as are determined by the governing authority or agency to be appropriate for inclusion; all factors determined relevant by the governing authority or agency or required by this paragraph (r) shall be duly included in the advertisement to elicit proposals.  After responses to the request for proposals have been duly received, the governing authority or agency shall select the most qualified proposal or proposals on the basis of price, technology and other relevant factors and from such proposals, but not limited to the terms thereof, negotiate and enter into contracts with one or more of the persons or firms submitting proposals.  If the governing authority or agency deems none of the proposals to be qualified or otherwise acceptable, the request for the proposals process may be reinitiated.  Notwithstanding any other provisions of this paragraph, where a county with at least thirty-five thousand (35,000) nor more than forty thousand (40,000) population, according to the 1990 federal decennial census, owns or operates a solid waste landfill, the governing authorities of any other county or municipality may contract with the governing authorities of the county owning or operating the landfill, pursuant to a resolution duly adopted and spread upon the minutes of each governing authority involved, for garbage or solid waste collection or disposal services through contract negotiations. (s)  Minority set-aside authorization.   * * *Notwithstanding any provision of this section to the contrary, any agency or governing authority, by order placed on its minutes, may, in its discretion, set aside not more than twenty percent (20%) of its anticipated annual expenditures for the purchase of commodities from minority businesses; however, all such set‑aside purchases shall comply with all purchasing regulations promulgated by the Department of Finance and Administration and shall be subject to bid requirements under this section.  Set‑aside purchases for which competitive bids are required shall be made from the lowest and best minority business bidder. Notwithstanding any federal law to the contrary, the governing authority of any state, county or municipal agencies, departments, offices or institutions, and any political subdivisions thereof, are prohibited from entering into minority set-aside purchases with a minority business or from providing a minority business with preferential treatment in regards to public contracts, on the basis of race, ethnicity or sex of the business owner or owners. For the purposes of this paragraph, the term "minority business" means a business which is owned by a person or a majority of persons who are United States citizens or permanent resident aliens (as defined by the Immigration and Naturalization Service) of the United States, and who are Asian, Black, Hispanic or Native American, according to the following definitions: (i) "Asian" means persons having origins in any of the original people of the Far East, Southeast Asia, the Indian subcontinent, or the Pacific Islands. (ii) "Black" means persons having origins in any black racial group of Africa. (iii) "Hispanic" means persons of Spanish or Portuguese culture with origins in Mexico, South or Central America, or the Caribbean Islands, regardless of race. (iv)  "Native American" means persons having origins in any of the original people of North America, including American Indians, Eskimos and Aleuts. For the purpose of this paragraph, "minority business" shall also include a business which is owned by a person or a majority of persons who are classified as a minority due to the sex of the owner or owners. (t)  Construction punch list restriction.  The architect, engineer or other representative designated by the agency or governing authority that is contracting for public construction or renovation may prepare and submit to the contractor only one (1) preliminary punch list of items that do not meet the contract requirements at the time of substantial completion and one (1) final list immediately before final completion and final payment. (u)  Procurement of construction services by state institutions of higher learning.  Contracts for privately financed construction of auxiliary facilities on the campus of a state institution of higher learning may be awarded by the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning to the lowest and best bidder, where sealed bids are solicited, or to the offeror whose proposal is determined to represent the best value to the citizens of the State of Mississippi, where requests for proposals are solicited. (v)  Insurability of bidders for public construction or other public contracts.  In any solicitation for bids to perform public construction or other public contracts to which this section applies, including, but not limited to, contracts for repair and maintenance, for which the contract will require insurance coverage in an amount of not less than One Million Dollars ($1,000,000.00), bidders shall be permitted to either submit proof of current insurance coverage in the specified amount or demonstrate ability to obtain the required coverage amount of insurance if the contract is awarded to the bidder.  Proof of insurance coverage shall be submitted within five (5) business days from bid acceptance. (w)  Purchase authorization clarification.  Nothing in this section shall be construed as authorizing any purchase not authorized by law. (x)  Mississippi Regional Pre-Need Disaster Clean Up Act.  (i)   The Department of Finance and Administration shall develop and implement a process that creates a preferred vendor list for both disaster debris removal and monitoring. (ii)  Any board of supervisors of any county or any governing authority of any municipality may opt in to the benefits and services provided under the appropriate and relevant contract established in subparagraph (i) of this paragraph at the time of a disaster event in that county or municipality.  At the time of opt in, the county or municipality shall assume responsibility for payment in full to the contractor for the disaster-related solid waste collection, disposal or monitoring services provided.  Nothing in this subparagraph (ii) shall be construed as requiring a county or municipality to opt in to any such contract established in subparagraph (i) of this paragraph. SECTION 4.  Section 57-69-5, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 57-69-5.  (1)  There is hereby created the Office of Minority Business Enterprises of the Mississippi Development Authority under the Mississippi Development Authority.  The Executive Director of the Mississippi Development Authority shall appoint an executive director for the office.  The executive director may employ a staff subject to approval of the Executive Director of the Mississippi Development Authority as necessary to carry out the purposes of this office. (2)  The office shall perform the following: (a)  Develop, plan and implement programs to provide an opportunity for participation by qualified minority owned businesses in public works and the process by which goods and services are procured by state agencies and educational institutions from the private sector; (b)  Develop a comprehensive plan encouraging that qualified minority owned businesses are provided an opportunity to participate in public contracts for public works and commodities and services; (c)  Identify barriers to equal participation by qualified minority owned businesses in all state agency and educational institution contracts; (d)  Develop and maintain a central minority business enterprise certification list for all state agencies and educational institutions; (e)  Adopt rules for the implementation of this chapter; (f)  Develop and maintain a central minority business enterprise certification program; (g)  Develop and maintain a central minority business enterprise supplier certification program; (h)  Submit an annual report to the Governor and the Legislature outlining the progress and economic impact on the public and private sectors of implementing this chapter; (i)  Increase efforts to inform minority businesses of state government procurement procedures and policies; (j)  Serve as the principal advocate in the state on behalf of minority business enterprises and minority business enterprise suppliers and provide advice in the consideration of administrative requirements and legislation that affect minority business enterprises and minority business enterprise suppliers; (k)  Evaluate the effectiveness of efforts of state agencies and other entities to assist minority business enterprises and minority business enterprise suppliers and make appropriate recommendations to assist the development and strengthening of minority business enterprises and minority business enterprise suppliers; (l)  Determine the availability of financial and other resources to minority business enterprises and minority business enterprise suppliers and recommend methods for: (i)  Increasing the availability of equity capital and other forms of financial assistance to minority business enterprises and minority business enterprise suppliers; (ii)  Generating markets for the goods and services of minority business enterprises and minority business enterprise suppliers; (iii)  Providing more effective education, training and management and technical assistance to minority business enterprises and minority business enterprise suppliers; and (iv)  Providing assistance to minority business enterprises and minority business enterprise suppliers in complying with federal, state and local laws; (m)  Serve as a focal point for receiving complaints and suggestions concerning state government policies and activities that affect minority business enterprises and minority business enterprise suppliers; (n)  Develop and advocate proposals for changes in state policies and activities that adversely affect minority business enterprises and minority business enterprise suppliers; (o)  Provide to legislative committees and state agencies information on the effects of proposed policies or actions that affect minority business enterprises and minority business enterprise suppliers; (p)  Enlist the assistance of public and private agencies, businesses and other organizations in disseminating information about state programs and services that benefit minority business enterprises and minority business enterprise suppliers and information regarding means by which minority business enterprises and minority business enterprise suppliers can use those programs and services; (q)  Identify sources of financial assistance for minority business enterprises, match minority business enterprises and minority business enterprise suppliers with sources of financial assistance, and assist minority business enterprises and minority business enterprise suppliers with the preparation of applications for loans from governmental or private sources; (r)  Sponsor meetings, to the extent practicable in cooperation with public and private educational institutions, to provide training and disseminate information beneficial to minority business enterprises and minority business enterprise suppliers; (s)  Assist minority business enterprises and minority business enterprise suppliers in their dealings with federal, state and local governmental agencies and provide information regarding governmental requirements affecting minority business enterprises and minority business enterprise suppliers; (t)  Develop and implement programs to encourage governmental agencies, public sector business associations and other organizations to provide useful services to minority business enterprises and minority business enterprise suppliers; (u)  Use available resources within the state, such as minority business enterprise development centers, educational institutions and nonprofit associations, to coordinate the provision of management and technical assistance to minority business enterprises and minority business enterprise suppliers in a systematic manner; (v)  Publish newsletters, brochures and other documents containing information useful to minority business enterprises and minority business enterprise suppliers; (w)  Identify successful minority business enterprise assistance programs provided by other states and determine the feasibility of adapting those programs for implementation in Mississippi; (x)  Establish an outreach program to make the existence of the office known to minority business enterprises, minority business enterprise suppliers and potential clients throughout the state; and (y)  Identify potential business opportunities for minority business enterprises and minority business enterprise suppliers and develop programs to maximize those opportunities. (3)  No provision of this section shall require or imply that the governing authority of any state, county or municipal agencies, departments, institutions or offices, and its political subdivisions, are required to provide minority businesses with preferential treatment in regards to public contracts or purchases on the basis of race, ethnicity or sex of the business owner or owners.  Notwithstanding any federal law to the contrary, minority set-aside contracts for public purchases by the governing authority of any state, county or municipal agencies, departments, institutions or offices, and its political subdivisions, are prohibited. SECTION 5.  Section 57-69-9, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 57-69-9.  Each state agency and educational institution shall report the participation of minority business enterprises in the public works and procurement contracts executed by the agency or institution.  The reports shall be made on a an annual basis.  The reporting requirement of this section shall not require or imply that the governing authority of any state, county or municipal agencies, departments, institutions or offices, and its political subdivisions, are required to provide minority businesses with preferential treatment in regards to public contracts or purchases on the basis of race, ethnicity or sex of the business owner or owners.  Notwithstanding any federal law to the contrary, minority set-aside contracts for public purchases by the governing authority of any state, county or municipal agencies, departments, institutions or offices, and its political subdivisions, are prohibited. SECTION 6.  Section 57-75-9, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 57-75-9.  (1)  The authority is hereby designated and empowered to act on behalf of the state in submitting a siting proposal for any project eligible for assistance under this act.  The authority is empowered to take all steps appropriate or necessary to effect the siting, development, and operation of the project within the state, including the negotiation of a fee-in-lieu.  If the state is selected as the preferred site for the project, the authority is hereby designated and empowered to act on behalf of the state and to represent the state in the planning, financing, development, construction and operation of the project or any facility related to the project, with the concurrence of the affected public agency.  The authority may take affirmative steps to coordinate fully all aspects of the submission of a siting proposal for the project and, if the state is selected as the preferred site, to coordinate fully, with the concurrence of the affected public agency, the development of the project or any facility related to the project with private business, the United States government and other public agencies.  All public agencies are encouraged to cooperate to the fullest extent possible to effectuate the duties of the authority; however, the development of the project or any facility related to the project by the authority may be done only with the concurrence of the affected public agency. (2)  (a)  Contracts, by the authority or a public agency, including, but not limited to, design and construction contracts, for the acquisition, purchase, construction or installation of a project defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(iv)1 or any facility related to the project shall be exempt from the provisions of Section 31-7-13 if: (i)  The authority finds and records such finding on its minutes, that because of availability or the particular nature of a project, it would not be in the public interest or would less effectively achieve the purposes of this chapter to enter into such contracts on the basis of Section 31-7-13; and (ii)  The enterprise that is involved in the project concurs in such finding. (b)  When the requirements of paragraph (a) of this subsection are met: (i)  The requirements of Section 31-7-13 shall not apply to such contracts; and (ii)  The contracts may be entered into on the basis of negotiation. (c)  The enterprise involved with the project may, upon approval of the authority, negotiate such contracts in the name of the authority. (d)  The provisions of this subsection (2) shall not apply to contracts by the authority for excavation, fill dirt and compaction for the preparation of the site of a project as defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(iv)1 and such contracts may be entered into pursuant to subsection (3) of this section. (3)  (a)  Contracts by the authority for excavation, fill dirt and compaction for the preparation of the site of a project defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(iv)1 shall be exempt from the provisions of Section 31-7-13 and the following procedure shall be followed in the award of such contracts: (i)  The authority shall advertise for a period of time to be set by the authority, but in no event less than one (1) business day, the date, time and place of a meeting with the authority to receive specifications on a request for proposals on excavation, fill dirt and compaction for the preparation of the site of the project defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(iv)1. (ii)  The authority shall set the minimum qualifications necessary to be considered for award of the contract and the advertisement shall set forth such minimum qualifications. (iii)  Following the meeting the authority shall, in its discretion, select one or more of the qualified contractors with whom to negotiate or award the contract.  The decision of the authority concerning the selection of the contractor shall be final. (b)  Contracts by the authority or a public agency for site preparation, utilities, real estate improvements, wastewater or for public works for a project defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xxi) or Section 57-75-5(f)(xxii) shall be exempt from the provisions of Section 31-7-13 and the following procedure shall be followed in the award of such contracts: (i)  The authority or the public agency shall advertise for a period of time to be set by the authority or the public agency, but in no event less than one (1) nor more than five (5) calendar days, the date, time and place of a meeting with the authority or the public agency to receive specifications on the preparation of the site of the project defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xxi) or Section 57-75-5(f)(xxii). (ii)  The authority or the public agency shall set the minimum qualifications necessary to be considered for award of the contract and the advertisement shall set forth such minimum qualifications. (iii)  Following the meeting the authority or the public agency shall, in its discretion, select one or more of the qualified contractors with whom to negotiate or award the contract.  The decision of the authority or the public agency concerning the selection of the contractor shall be final. (c)  Contracts by a public agency for site preparation, utilities, real estate improvements, infrastructure, roads or for public works for a project defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xxiii), Section 57-75-5(f)(xxix), Section 57-75-5(f)(xxx), Section 57-75-5(f)(xxxi), Section 57-75-5(f)(xxxii) or Section 57-75-5(f)(xxxiii) may be exempt from the provisions of Section 31-7-13 and the following procedure shall be followed in the award of contracts: (i)  The public agency shall advertise for a period of time to be set by the public agency, but in no event less than one (1) nor more than five (5) calendar days, the date, time and place of a meeting with the public agency to receive specifications on site preparation, utilities, real estate improvements, infrastructure, roads or for public works related to the project defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xxiii), Section 57-75-5(f)(xxix), Section 57-75-5(f)(xxx), Section 57-75-5(f)(xxxi), Section 57-75-5(f)(xxxii) or Section 57-75-5(f)(xxxiii). (ii)  The public agency shall set the minimum qualifications necessary to be considered for award of the contract and the advertisement shall set forth such minimum qualifications. (iii)  Following the meeting the public agency shall, in its discretion, which discretion may include participation by an enterprise involved in the project, select one or more of the qualified contractors with whom to negotiate or award the contract.  The decision of the public agency concerning selection of the contractor shall be final. (4)  (a)  Contracts, by the authority or a public agency, including, but not limited to, design and construction contracts, for the acquisition, purchase, construction or installation of a project defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xxvi), Section 57-75-5(f)(xxvii), Section 57-75-5(f)(xxviii), Section 57-75-5(f)(xxix), Section 57-75-5(f)(xxx), Section 57-75-5(f)(xxxi), Section 57-75-5(f)(xxxii) or Section 57-75-5(f)(xxxiii), and any contracts by the authority or a public agency for site preparation, utilities, real estate improvements, infrastructure, roads or for other public facilities related to any such project shall be exempt from the provisions of Section 31-7-13 if: (i)  The authority finds and records such finding on its minutes, that because of availability or the particular nature of a project, it would not be in the public interest or would less effectively achieve the purposes of this chapter to enter into such contracts on the basis of Section 31-7-13; and (ii)  The enterprise that is involved in the project concurs in such finding. (b)  When the requirements of paragraph (a) of this subsection are met: (i)  The requirements of Section 31-7-13 shall not apply to such contracts; and (ii)  The contracts may be entered into on the basis of negotiation with the authority or such public agency, and the authority or such public agency may, as part of such negotiations, further negotiate and require the level of participation by the enterprise involved in the project in the negotiation of such contracts. (c)  Contracts by the authority or a public agency for site preparation, utilities, real estate improvements, infrastructure, roads or for other public facilities related to a project defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xxxii), shall be exempt from the provisions of Section 65-1-85, and the authority or public agency is authorized to use any method for design and/or construction procurement and contracting.  With respect to any such contract that is anticipated to be federally funded, in whole or in part, the authority or public agency may nonetheless comply with the provisions of Section 65-1-85 for purposes of compliance with any applicable federal funding requirements. (d)  The decision of the authority or the public agency concerning selection of the contractor shall be final. (e)  The company shall make commercially reasonable efforts to place out for bid, such that Mississippi Contractors and Mississippi Disadvantaged Business Enterprises ("DBEs") shall have an equal opportunity to respond to such bid, any contract by the company which (i) is subject to tax pursuant to Mississippi Code Section 27-65-21 (i.e., contracts for constructing, building, erecting, grading, excavating, etc.), and (ii) will be paid, or payment thereunder by the company will be reimbursed, using any portion of the grant proceeds or funds provided by the authority to the company in accordance with this agreement.  In carrying out such efforts, in order to increase the pool of qualified DBE bidders, the company will request that successful prime contract bidders include in their response a commitment to (a) participate in and/or host forums that highlight subcontract bidding opportunities for DBEs; and (b) work with various trade associations and the Mississippi Development Authority to promote increased participation from DBEs.  With respect to awarding any contract placed out for bid, the company shall be allowed to award such contract in the company's sole discretion (e.g., based upon optimization of quality, cost and efficiency or on any other basis as the company may see fit).  MDA agrees that it will offer to eligible contractor DBEs that have an opportunity to work on the project assistance through its Minority Surety Bond Guaranty Program.  Agreement by MDA to offer the use of the Minority Surety Bond Guaranty Program shall not require or imply that the governing authority of any state, county or municipal agencies, departments, institutions or offices, and its political subdivisions, are required to provide minority businesses with preferential treatment in regards to public contracts or purchases on the basis of race, ethnicity or sex of the business owner or owners.  Notwithstanding any federal law to the contrary, minority set-aside contracts for public purchases by the governing authority of any state, county or municipal agencies, departments, institutions or offices, and its political subdivisions, are prohibited. (5)  The Department of Employment Security is authorized to provide to the authority any information received, obtained or produced, or findings or determinations made thereby, with respect to any jobs created or maintained for a project that has been certified by the authority as a project as defined in Section 57-75-5(f). SECTION 7.  Section 57-75-11, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 57-75-11.  The authority, in addition to any and all powers now or hereafter granted to it, is empowered and shall exercise discretion and the use of these powers depending on the circumstances of the project or projects: (a)  To maintain an office at a place or places within the state. (b)  To employ or contract with architects, engineers, attorneys, accountants, construction and financial experts and such other advisors, consultants and agents as may be necessary in its judgment and to fix and pay their compensation. (c)  To make such applications and enter into such contracts for financial assistance as may be appropriate under applicable federal or state law. (d)  To apply for, accept and utilize grants, gifts and other funds or aid from any source for any purpose contemplated by the act, and to comply, subject to the provisions of this act, with the terms and conditions thereof. (e)  (i)  To acquire by purchase, lease, gift, or in other manner, including quick-take eminent domain, or obtain options to acquire, and to own, maintain, use, operate and convey any and all property of any kind, real, personal, or mixed, or any interest or estate therein, within the project area, necessary for the project or any facility related to the project.  The provisions of this paragraph that allow the acquisition of property by quick-take eminent domain shall be repealed by operation of law on July 1, 1994; and (ii) Notwithstanding any other provision of this paragraph (e), from and after November 6, 2000, to exercise the right of immediate possession pursuant to the provisions of Sections 11-27-81 through 11-27-89 for the purpose of acquiring land, property and/or rights-of-way in the county in which a project as defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(iv)(1) is located, that are necessary for such project or any facility related to the project. (f)  To acquire by purchase or lease any public lands and public property, including sixteenth section lands and lieu lands, within the project area, which are necessary for the project.  Sixteenth section lands or lieu lands acquired under this act shall be deemed to be acquired for the purposes of industrial development thereon and such acquisition will serve a higher public interest in accordance with the purposes of this act. (g)  If the authority identifies any land owned by the state as being necessary, for the location or use of the project, or any facility related to the project, to recommend to the Legislature the conveyance of such land or any interest therein, as the Legislature deems appropriate. (h)  To make or cause to be made such examinations and surveys as may be necessary to the planning, design, construction and operation of the project. (i)  From and after the date of notification to the authority by the enterprise that the state has been finally selected as the site of the project, to acquire by condemnation and to own, maintain, use, operate and convey or otherwise dispose of any and all property of any kind, real, personal or mixed, or any interest or estate therein, within the project area, necessary for the project or any facility related to the project, with the concurrence of the affected public agency, and the exercise of the powers granted by this act, according to the procedures provided by Chapter 27, Title 11, Mississippi Code of 1972, except as modified by this act. (i)  Except as otherwise provided in subparagraph (iii) of this paragraph (i), in acquiring lands by condemnation, the authority shall not acquire minerals or royalties in minerals unless a competent registered professional engineer shall have certified that the acquisition of such minerals and royalties in minerals is necessary for purposes of the project; provided that limestone, clay, chalk, sand and gravel shall not be considered as minerals for the purposes of subparagraphs (i) and (ii) of this paragraph (i); (ii)  Unless minerals or royalties in minerals have been acquired by condemnation or otherwise, no person or persons owning the drilling rights or the right to share in production of minerals shall be prevented from exploring, developing, or producing oil or gas with necessary rights-of-way for ingress and egress, pipelines and other means of transporting interests on any land or interest therein of the authority held or used for the purposes of this act; but any such activities shall be under such reasonable regulation by the authority as will adequately protect the project contemplated by this act as provided in paragraph (r) of this section; and (iii)  In acquiring lands by condemnation, including the exercise of immediate possession, for a project, as defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(iv)1, the authority may acquire minerals or royalties in minerals. (j)  To negotiate the necessary relocation or rerouting of roads and highways, railroad, telephone and telegraph lines and properties, electric power lines, pipelines and related facilities, or to require the anchoring or other protection of any of these, provided due compensation is paid to the owners thereof or agreement is had with such owners regarding the payment of the cost of such relocation, and to acquire by condemnation or otherwise easements or rights-of-way for such relocation or rerouting and to convey the same to the owners of the facilities being relocated or rerouted in connection with the purposes of this act. (k)  To negotiate the necessary relocation of graves and cemeteries and to pay all reasonable costs thereof. (l)  To perform or have performed any and all acts and make all payments necessary to comply with all applicable federal laws, rules or regulations including, but not limited to, the Uniform Relocation Assistance and Real Property Acquisition Policies Act of 1970 (42 USCS 4601, 4602, 4621 to 4638, and 4651 to 4655) and relocation rules and regulations promulgated by any agency or department of the federal government. (m)  To construct, extend, improve, maintain, and reconstruct, to cause to be constructed, extended, improved, maintained, and reconstructed, and to use and operate any and all components of the project or any facility related to the project, with the concurrence of the affected public agency, within the project area, necessary to the project and to the exercise of such powers, rights, and privileges granted the authority. (n)  To incur or defray any designated portion of the cost of any component of the project or any facility related to the project acquired or constructed by any public agency. (o)  (i)  To lease, sell or convey any or all property acquired by the authority under the provisions of this act to the enterprise, its successors or assigns, and/or any entity for purposes in furtherance of economic development as determined by the authority, and in connection therewith to pay the costs of title search, perfection of title, title insurance and recording fees as may be required. The authority may provide in the instrument conveying such property a provision that such property shall revert to the authority if, as and when the property is declared by the transferee to be no longer needed. (ii)  To lease, sell, transfer or convey on any terms agreed upon by the authority any or all real and personal property, improvements, leases, funds and contractual obligations of a project as defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(vi) and conveyed to the State of Mississippi by a Quitclaim Deed from the United States of America dated February 23, 1996, filed of record at pages 511 to 524, Deed Book Number B179, Chancery Clerk's Office, Tishomingo County, Mississippi, to any governmental authority located within the geographic boundaries of the county wherein such project exists upon agreement of such governmental authority to undertake and assume from the State of Mississippi all obligations and responsibilities in connection with ownership and operation of the project. Property leased, sold, transferred or otherwise conveyed by the authority under this paragraph (o) shall be used only for economic development purposes. (p)  To enter into contracts with any person or public agency, including, but not limited to, contracts authorized by Section 57-75-17, in furtherance of any of the purposes authorized by this act upon such consideration as the authority and such person or public agency may agree.  Any such contract may extend over any period of time, notwithstanding any rule of law to the contrary, may be upon such terms as the parties thereto shall agree, and may provide that it shall continue in effect until bonds specified therein, refunding bonds issued in lieu of such bonds, and all other obligations specified therein are paid or terminated.  Any such contract shall be binding upon the parties thereto according to its terms.  Such contracts may include an agreement to reimburse the enterprise, its successors and assigns for any assistance provided by the enterprise in the acquisition of real property for the project or any facility related to the project. (q)  To establish and maintain reasonable rates and charges for the use of any facility within the project area owned or operated by the authority, and from time to time, to adjust such rates and to impose penalties for failure to pay such rates and charges when due. (r)  To adopt and enforce with the concurrence of the affected public agency all necessary and reasonable rules and regulations to carry out and effectuate the implementation of the project and any land use plan or zoning classification adopted for the project area, including, but not limited to, rules, regulations, and restrictions concerning mining, construction, excavation or any other activity the occurrence of which may endanger the structure or operation of the project.  Such rules may be enforced within the project area and without the project area as necessary to protect the structure and operation of the project.  The authority is authorized to plan or replan, zone or rezone, and make exceptions to any regulations, whether local or state, with the concurrence of the affected public agency which are inconsistent with the design, planning, construction or operation of the project and facilities related to the project. (s)  To plan, design, coordinate and implement measures and programs to mitigate impacts on the natural environment caused by the project or any facility related to the project. (t)  To develop plans for technology transfer activities to ensure private sector conduits for exchange of information, technology and expertise related to the project to generate opportunities for commercial development within the state. (u)  To consult with the State Department of Education and other public agencies for the purpose of improving public schools and curricula within the project area. (v)  To consult with the State Board of Health and other public agencies for the purpose of improving medical centers, hospitals and public health centers in order to provide appropriate health care facilities within the project area. (w)  To consult with the Office of Minority Business Enterprise Development and other public agencies for the purpose of developing plans for technical assistance and loan programs to maximize the economic impact related to the project for minority business enterprises within the State of Mississippi.  This paragraph shall not require or imply that the governing authority of any state, county or municipal agencies, departments, institutions or offices, and its political subdivisions, are required to provide minority businesses with preferential treatment in regards to public contracts or purchases on the basis of race, ethnicity or sex of the business owner or owners.  Notwithstanding any federal law to the contrary, minority set-aside contracts for public purchases by the governing authority of any state, county or municipal agencies, departments, institutions or offices, and its political subdivisions, are prohibited. (x)  To deposit into the "Yellow Creek Project Area Fund" created pursuant to Section 57-75-31: (i)  Any funds or aid received as authorized in this section for the project described in Section 57-75-5(f)(vi); and (ii)  Any funds received from the sale or lease of property from the project described in Section 57-75-5(f)(vi) pursuant to the powers exercised under this section. (y)  To manage and develop the project described in Section 57-75-5(f)(vi). (z)  To promulgate rules and regulations necessary to effectuate the purposes of this act. (aa)  To negotiate a fee-in-lieu with the owners of the project. (bb)  To enter into contractual agreements to warrant any site work for a project defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(iv)1; provided, however, that the aggregate amount of such warranties shall not exceed Fifteen Million Dollars ($15,000,000.00). (cc)  To provide grant funds to an enterprise operating a project defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(iv)1 in an amount not to exceed Thirty-nine Million Dollars ($39,000,000.00). (dd)  (i)  To own surface water transmission lines constructed with the proceeds of bonds issued pursuant to this act and in connection therewith to purchase and provide water to any project defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(iv) and to certificated water providers; and (ii)  To lease such surface water transmission lines to a public agency or public utility to provide water to such project and to certificated water providers. (ee)  To provide grant funds to an enterprise operating a project defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(v) or, in connection with a facility related to such a project, for job training, recruiting and infrastructure. (ff)  To enter into negotiations with persons proposing projects defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xi) and execute acquisition options and conduct planning, design and environmental impact studies with regard to such project. (gg)  To establish such guidelines, rules and regulations as the authority may deem necessary and appropriate from time to time in its sole discretion, to promote the purposes of this act. (hh)  In connection with projects defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(ii): (i)  To provide grant funds or loans to a public agency or an enterprise owning, leasing or operating a project defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(ii) in amounts not to exceed the amount authorized in Section 57-75-15(3)(b); (ii)  To supervise the use of all such grant funds or loans; and (iii)  To requisition money in the Mississippi Major Economic Impact Authority Revolving Loan Fund in connection with such loans. (ii)  In connection with projects defined under Section 57-75-5(f)(xiv): (i)  To provide grant funds or loans to an enterprise owning, leasing or operating a project defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xiv); however, the aggregate amount of any such loans under this paragraph (ii) shall not exceed Eighteen Million Dollars ($18,000,000.00) and the aggregate amount of any such grants under this paragraph (ii) shall not exceed Six Million Dollars ($6,000,000.00); (ii)  To supervise the use of all such grant funds or loans; and (iii) Notwithstanding any provision of this act to the contrary, such loans shall be for a term not to exceed twenty (20) years as may be determined by the authority, shall bear interest at such rates as may be determined by the authority, shall, in the sole discretion of the authority, be secured in an amount and a manner as may be determined by the authority. (jj)  In connection with projects defined under Section 57-75-5(f)(xviii): (i)  To provide grant funds of Twenty-five Million Dollars ($25,000,000.00) to an enterprise owning or operating a project defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xviii) to be used for real estate improvements and which may be disbursed as determined by the authority; (ii)  To provide loans to an enterprise owning or operating a project defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xviii) or make payments to a lender providing financing to the enterprise; subject to the following provisions: 1.  Not more than Ten Million Dollars ($10,000,000.00) may be loaned to such an enterprise for the purpose of defraying costs incurred by the enterprise for site preparation and real property improvements during the construction of the project in excess of budgeted costs; however, the amount of any such loan shall not exceed fifty percent (50%) of such excess costs; 2.  Not more than Sixty Million Dollars ($60,000,000.00) may be loaned to such an enterprise or paid to a lender providing financing to the enterprise for purposes determined appropriate by the authority, and the enterprise shall be obligated to repay the amount of the loan or payment plus any expenses incurred by the state as a result of the issuance of bonds pursuant to Section 57-75-15(3)(p); however, no such loan or payment may be made before the beginning of the fifth year after issuance by the enterprise of debt in like amount the proceeds of which are to be used in connection with the project; (iii)  To supervise the use of all such loan funds; (iv)  Loans under this paragraph (jj) may be for any term determined appropriate by the authority provided that the payments on any loan must be in an amount sufficient to pay the state's debt service on bonds issued for the purpose of providing funds for such a loan; and (v)  The repayment obligation of the enterprise for any loan or payment authorized under this paragraph (jj) shall, in the discretion of the authority, be secured in an amount and a manner as may be determined by the authority. (kk)  In connection with projects defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xxi) or a facility related to such a project: (i)  To provide grant funds to reimburse public agencies, Itawamba Community College, Northeast Mississippi Community College, and/or East Mississippi Community College, public or private nonprofits or an enterprise owning or operating a project as defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xxi) for site preparation, real estate improvements, utilities, railroads, roads, infrastructure, job training, recruiting and any other expenses approved by the authority in amounts not to exceed the amount authorized in Section 57-75-15(3)(s); (ii)  To supervise the use of all such grant funds so reimbursed; and (iii)  To enter into contractual agreements to warrant site preparation and availability for a project defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xxi). (ll)  In connection with a project related to a Tier One supplier: (i)  To provide grant funds to reimburse public agencies, public or private nonprofits and Tier One suppliers for site preparation, real estate improvements, utilities, railroads, roads, infrastructure, job training, recruiting and any other expenses approved by the authority in amounts not to exceed the amount authorized in Section 57-75-15(3)(t); (ii)  To supervise the use of all such grant funds so reimbursed. (mm)  In connection with projects defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xxii) or a facility related to such a project: (i)  To provide grant funds to reimburse public agencies or an enterprise owning or operating a project as defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xxii) for site preparation, real estate improvements, utilities, fire protection, wastewater, railroads, roads, infrastructure, job training, recruiting and any other expenses approved by the authority in amounts not to exceed the amount authorized in Section 57-75-15(3)(u); and (ii)  To supervise the use of all such grant funds so reimbursed. (nn)  It is the policy of the authority and the authority is authorized to accommodate and support any enterprise owning or operating a project defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xviii), 57-75-5(f)(xxi), 57-75-5(f)(xxii), 57-75-5(f)(xxvi), 57-75-5(f)(xxvii), 57-75-5(f)(xxviii), 57-75-5(f)(xxix), 57-75-5(f)(xxx), 57-75-5(f)(xxxi), 57-75-5(f)(xxxii) or 57-75-5(f)(xxxiii), or an enterprise developing or owning a project defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xx), that wishes to have a program of diversity in contracting, and/or that wishes to do business with or cause its prime contractor to do business with Mississippi companies, including those companies that are small business concerns owned and controlled by socially and economically disadvantaged individuals.  The term "socially and economically disadvantaged individuals" shall have the meaning ascribed to such term under Section 8(d) of the Small Business Act (15 USCS 637(d)) and relevant subcontracting regulations promulgated pursuant thereto; except that women shall be presumed to be socially and economically disadvantaged individuals for the purposes of this paragraph. (oo)  To provide grant funds to an enterprise developing or owning a project defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xx) for reimbursement of costs incurred by such enterprise for infrastructure improvements in the initial phase of development of the project, upon dedication of such improvements to the appropriate public agency. (pp)  In connection with projects defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xxiii): (i)  To provide grant funds to reimburse public agencies or an enterprise operating a project as defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xxiii) for site preparation, utilities, real estate improvements, infrastructure, roads, public works, job training and any other expenses approved by the authority in amounts not to exceed the amount authorized in Section 57-75-15(3)(v); and (ii)  To supervise the use of all such grant funds so reimbursed. (qq)  (i)  To provide grant funds for the expansion of a publicly owned building for the project defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xxiv) or loans to an enterprise owning, leasing or operating a project defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xxiv) for the purchase and/or relocation of equipment, or for any other purpose related to the project as approved by the authority; however, the aggregate amount of any such loans under this paragraph (qq) shall not exceed Six Million Dollars ($6,000,000.00) and the aggregate amount of any such grants under this paragraph (qq) shall not exceed Seven Million Dollars ($7,000,000.00); (ii)  To supervise the use of all such grant funds or loans; and (iii) Notwithstanding any provision of this act to the contrary, such loans shall be for a term not to exceed ten (10) years as may be determined by the authority, shall bear a rate of interest to be determined by the authority, and shall be secured in an amount and a manner as may be determined by the authority. (rr)  (i)  To provide grant funds to an enterprise owning or operating a project defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xxv) for reimbursement of costs incurred by the enterprise in reconfiguring the manufacturing plant and for the purchase of equipment, or for any other purpose related to the project as approved by the authority; (ii)  To supervise the use of all such grant funds. (ss)  In connection with projects defined under Section 57-75-5(f)(xxvi): (i)  To provide grant funds and/or loans to a public agency in an amount not to exceed Fifteen Million Dollars ($15,000,000.00) for the construction of a publicly owned building to be leased by the enterprise owning or operating the project; (ii)  To provide loan guarantees in an amount not to exceed the total cost of the project for which financing is sought or Twenty Million Dollars ($20,000,000.00), whichever is less, for the purpose of encouraging the extension of conventional financing and the issuance of letters of credit to the enterprise owning or operating the project; (iii)  In connection with any loan guarantee made pursuant to this paragraph, to make payments to lenders providing financing to the enterprise owning or operating the project and the enterprise shall be obligated to repay the amount of the payment plus any expenses incurred by the state as a result of the issuance of bonds pursuant to Section 57-75-15(3)(y); (iv)  To supervise the use of all such grant funds, loan funds or payments; and (v)  To require the enterprise owning or operating the project to provide security for the repayment obligation for any loan guarantee authorized under this paragraph in an amount and in a manner as may be determined by the authority. (tt)  In connection with projects defined under Section 57-75-5(f)(xxvii): (i)  To provide loans to a public agency in an amount not to exceed Fifty Million Dollars ($50,000,000.00) for the construction of a publicly owned building and acquisition of equipment to be leased by the enterprise owning or operating the project; and (ii)  To supervise the use of all such loan funds. (uu)  In connection with projects defined under Section 57-75-5(f)(xxviii): (i)  To provide grant funds to reimburse public agencies or an enterprise operating a project for site preparation, utilities, real estate purchase and improvements, infrastructure, roads, rail improvements, public works, job training and any other expenses approved by the authority in amounts not to exceed the amount authorized in Section 57-75-15(3)(aa); (ii)  To supervise the use of all such grant funds so reimbursed. (vv)  In connection with projects defined under Section 57-75-5(f)(xxix): (i)  To provide grant funds to reimburse or otherwise defray the costs incurred by public agencies or an enterprise operating a project for site preparation, utilities, real estate purchases, purchase options and improvements, infrastructure, roads, rail improvements, public works, buildings and fixtures, job recruitment and training, as well as planning, design, environmental mitigation and environmental impact studies with respect to a project, and any other purposes approved by the authority in amounts not to exceed the amount authorized in Section 57-75-15(3)(bb); (ii)  To provide loans to public agencies for site preparation, utilities, real estate purchases, purchase options and improvements, infrastructure, roads, rail improvements, public works, buildings and fixtures, job recruiting and training, as well as planning, design, environmental mitigation and environmental impact studies with respect to a project, and any other purposes approved by the authority in amounts not to exceed the amount authorized in Section 57-75-15(3)(bb); (iii)  To supervise the use of all such grant funds so reimbursed and/or loans so made; and (iv)  To the extent that the authority enters into any construction or similar contract for site preparation work or for the construction of any improvements on a project site, to assign or otherwise transfer to an enterprise or affiliate thereof that owns or operates such a project on such project site any and all contractual, express or implied warranties of any kind arising from such contract or work performed or materials purchased in connection therewith, and cause any such contract to contain terms and provisions designating such enterprise as a third-party beneficiary under the contract. (ww)  In connection with projects defined under Section 57-75-5(f)(xxx): (i)  To provide grant funds to reimburse or otherwise defray the costs incurred by public agencies or an enterprise operating a project for public infrastructure needs, site preparation, building improvements, purchase of launch systems, recruitment of employees to fill new full-time jobs, providing internal company training and train prospective, new and existing employees of the enterprise associated with the project, including training of company employees who will utilize such instruction to teach other prospective, new and existing employees of the company and other workforce expenses and any other expenses approved by the authority in amounts not to exceed the amount authorized in Section 57-75-15(3)(cc); and (ii)  To supervise the use of all such grant funds so reimbursed. (xx)  In connection with projects defined under Section 57-75-5(f)(xxxi): (i)  To provide grant funds to reimburse or otherwise defray the costs incurred by public agencies or any enterprise operating one or more such projects for site preparation, utilities, real estate purchases, purchase options and improvements, infrastructure, utilities, roads, rail improvements, public works, buildings and fixtures, job recruitment and training, as well as planning, design, environmental mitigation and environmental impact studies with respect to a project, and any other purposes approved by the authority in amounts not to exceed the amount authorized in Section 57-75-15(3)(dd); (ii)  To provide loans to public agencies for site preparation, utilities, real estate purchases, purchase options and improvements, infrastructure, roads, rail improvements, public works, buildings and fixtures, job recruiting and training, as well as planning, design, environmental mitigation and environmental impact studies with respect to a project, and any other purposes approved by the authority in amounts not to exceed the amount authorized in Section 57-75-15(3)(dd). (yy)  (i)  In connection with projects defined under Section 57-75-5(f)(xxxi), the authority is further authorized to provide to the enterprises operating one or more of the projects, an annual grant in an amount not to exceed three and one-half percent (3.5%) of the additional payroll for a period of ten (10) consecutive years.  Each such aggregate annual grant amount shall be remitted to one or more of the enterprises and/or one or more of their affiliates, in such sub-amounts as the enterprises shall collectively direct, or that their common direct or indirect parent company shall direct, in writing, to the authority each year during such ten-year period.  The ten-year period for the series of ten (10) annual grants authorized by this paragraph (yy) shall commence no later than January 1, 2029. (ii)  In the event that the annual number of full-time jobs maintained or caused to be maintained by the enterprises operating one or more projects and/or one or more affiliates thereof falls below the minimum annual number of full-time jobs required by the authority pursuant to a written agreement between the authority and the enterprises and/or any affiliate thereof for one or more years, the annual grant authorized by this paragraph (yy) may be reduced or suspended by the authority until the first calendar year during which the annual number of full-time jobs maintained or caused to be maintained by the enterprises and/or their affiliates reaches the minimum annual number of full-time jobs required by the authority pursuant to the written agreement. (iii)  The annual grants authorized by this paragraph (yy) may be funded from the proceeds of bonds issued pursuant to Section 57-75-15(3)(dd); provided that the aggregate amount of the annual grants over the entire ten-year period shall not exceed Forty-five Million Dollars ($45,000,000.00). (iv)  For purposes of this paragraph (yy): 1. "Additional payroll" shall mean the sum of the annual payroll amount (i.e., all annual employee income that is subject to State of Mississippi and/or federal income taxation) for any calendar year beginning January 1, 2023, which is associated with full-time jobs created and maintained by all enterprises that undertake any project and/or by any affiliates thereof, in excess of the amount the annualized payroll (i.e., all annual employee income that is subject to State of Mississippi and/or federal income taxation), which is associated with employees employed in the State of Mississippi by such enterprises or their affiliates as of September 30, 2022; and 2.  "Base payroll level" shall mean the annualized payroll amount (i.e., all annual employee income that is subject to State of Mississippi and/or federal income taxation) paid to employees employed in the State of Mississippi by all enterprises that undertake any project and/or by any affiliates thereof during the twelve-month period ending on September 30, 2022. (v)  The Mississippi Development Authority may promulgate rules and regulations necessary to administer the provisions of this paragraph (yy) and may otherwise administer and prescribe rules and restrictions with respect to the annual grant authorized by this paragraph (yy) pursuant to a written agreement between the authority and any enterprises operating one or more projects and/or any affiliate thereof. (zz)  In connection with a project defined under Section 57-75-5(f)(xxxii): (i)  To provide grant funds to reimburse or otherwise defray the costs incurred by public agencies or any enterprise operating one or more such projects for site preparation, utilities, real estate purchases, purchase options and improvements, infrastructure, utilities, roads, rail improvements, public works, buildings and fixtures, job recruitment and training, as well as planning, design, environmental mitigation and environmental impact studies with respect to a project, and any other purposes approved by the authority in amounts not to exceed the amount authorized in Section 57-75-15(3)(ee); (ii)  To provide loans, grants and other funds to public agencies for site preparation, utilities, real estate purchases, purchase options and improvements, infrastructure, roads, rail improvements, public works, buildings and fixtures, job recruiting and training, as well as planning, design, environmental mitigation and environmental impact studies with respect to a project, and any other purposes approved by the authority in amounts not to exceed the amount authorized in Section 57-75-15(3)(ee). (aaa)  In connection with a project defined under Section 57-75-5(f)(xxxiii): (i)  To provide grant funds to reimburse or otherwise defray the costs incurred by public agencies or any enterprise operating one or more such projects for site preparation, utilities, real estate purchases, purchase options and improvements, infrastructure, utilities, roads, rail improvements, public works, buildings and fixtures, job recruitment and training, as well as planning, design, environmental mitigation and environmental impact studies with respect to a project, and any other purposes approved by the authority in amounts not to exceed the amount authorized in Section 57-75-15(3)(ff); and (ii)  To provide loans to public agencies for site preparation, utilities, real estate purchases, purchase options and improvements, infrastructure, roads, rail improvements, public works, buildings and fixtures, job recruiting and training, as well as planning, design, environmental mitigation and environmental impact studies with respect to a project, and any other purposes approved by the authority in amounts not to exceed the amount authorized in Section 57-75-15(3)(ff). (aab)  (i)  In addition to any other requirements or conditions under this chapter, the authority shall require that any application required by the authority for assistance regarding a project under this chapter include, at a minimum: 1.  A two-year business plan (which shall include pro forma balance sheets, income statements and monthly cash flow statements); 2.  Financial statements or tax returns for the three (3) years immediately prior to the application (if the project is a new company or enterprise, personal financial statements or tax returns will be required); 3.  Credit reports on all persons or entities with a twenty percent (20%) or greater interest in the project; 4.  Data supporting the expertise of the project's principals; 5.  A cost-benefit analysis of the project performed by a state institution of higher learning or other entity selected by the authority; and 6.  Any other information required by the authority. (ii)  The authority shall require that binding commitments be entered into requiring that: 1.  The applicable minimum requirements of this chapter and such other requirements as the authority considers proper shall be met; and 2.  If the agreed upon commitments are not met, all or a portion of the funds provided under this chapter as determined by the authority shall be repaid. (iii)  Where appropriate, in the discretion of the authority, the authority shall acquire a security interest in or other lien upon any applicable collateral. (iv)  The provisions of this paragraph (xx) shall not apply to a project defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xxiii). SECTION 8.  Section 57-75-21, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 57-75-21.  (1)  (a)  The authority shall * * * set a goal to expend not less than ten percent (10%) of the total amounts expended by the authority on monitor the planning, construction, training, research, development, testing, evaluation, personal services, procurement, and for the operation and maintenance of any facilities or activities controlled by such authority, with minority small business concerns owned and controlled by socially and economically disadvantaged individuals. For the purpose of determining the total amounts expended with such minority small business concerns, credit shall be given for that portion of any prime contract entered into with the authority which inures to the benefit of such minority small business concern as a subcontractor thereunder. (b)  For the purposes of this section, the term "socially and economically disadvantaged individuals" shall have the meaning ascribed to such term under Section 8(d) of the Small Business Act (15 USCS, Section 637(d)) and relevant subcontracting regulations promulgated pursuant thereto. (c)  For the purposes of this section, the term "minority small business concern" means any small business concern: (i)  Which is at least fifty-one percent (51%) owned by one or more socially and economically disadvantaged individuals; or, in the case of any publicly owned businesses, at least fifty-one percent (51%) of the stock of which is owned by one or more socially and economically disadvantaged individuals; and (ii)  Whose management and daily business operations are controlled by one or more of such individuals. (d)  For the purpose of this section, the term "small business concern" shall mean "small business" as the latter term is defined in Section 57-10-155, Mississippi Code of 1972. (2) * * *  In order to comply in a timely manner with its minority small business participation mandate, the authority shall set an annual goal to expend not less than ten percent (10%) of its aggregate yearly expenditures with minority small business concerns.  The provisions of this section shall not be interpreted to require or imply that the governing authority of any state, county or municipal agencies, departments, institutions or offices, and its political subdivisions, are required to provide minority small businesses with preferential treatment in regards to public contracts or purchases on the basis of race, ethnicity or sex of the business owner or owners.  Notwithstanding any federal law to the contrary, minority set-aside contracts for public purchases by the governing authority of any state, county or municipal agencies, departments, institutions or offices, and its political subdivisions, are prohibited. (3)  The authority shall: (a)  Monitor the minority small business concerns assistance programs prescribed in this section. (b)  Review and determine the business capabilities of minority small business concerns. (c)  Establish standards for a certification procedure for minority small business concerns seeking to do business with the authority. (d)  Provide technical assistance services to minority small business concerns.  Such technical assistance shall include but not be limited to: (i)  Research; (ii)  Assistance in obtaining bonds; (iii)  Bid preparation; (iv)  Certification of business concerns; (v)  Marketing assistance; and (vi)  Joint venture and capital development. (e)  Develop alternative bidding and contracting procedures for minority small business concerns in conjunction with the State Fiscal Management Board and the Governor's Office of General Services. (f)  Utilize such alternative bidding and contracting procedures in lieu of those prescribed in Title 31, Chapters 5 and 7, Mississippi Code of 1972, when contracting with minority small business concerns that have qualified to bid for contracts and have satisfied any other disclosure provisions required by the authority. (g)  Be authorized to accept in lieu of any bond otherwise required from minority small business concerns or small business concerns contracting with the authority, in an amount equal to one hundred percent (100%) of the total cost of the contracted project, any combination of the following: (i)  Cash; (ii)  Certificates of deposit from any bank or banking corporation insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation or the Federal Savings and Loan Insurance Corporation; (iii)  Federal treasury bills; (iv)  Letters of credit issued by a bank as that term is defined in Section 81-3-1, Mississippi Code of 1972; or (v)  Surety bonds issued by an insurance company licensed and qualified to do business in the State of Mississippi. (h)  Be authorized, in its discretion, to waive any bond required on any project which does not exceed a total dollar value of One Hundred Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00).  A retainage shall be held by the authority in an amount not to exceed fifteen percent (15%) from each draw according to American Institute of Architects (AIA) standards.  Upon satisfactory completion of such project, ten percent (10%) of the total cost of the contract shall be held in an interest-bearing escrow account for one (1) year. Funds deposited in such escrow account shall stand as a surety for any defects in workmanship or materials detected within twelve (12) months of completion.  The balance of all monies so escrowed including accrued interest shall be paid to the contractor at the end of such twelve-month period. (i)  Be empowered to provide an incentive of bimonthly payments to any prime contractors utilizing minority small business concerns as subcontractors on twenty-five percent (25%) or more of the total dollar value of any single project or contract. (j)  Submit an annual report on its progress concerning minority small business contracts to the Legislature by January 30 of each year. (k)  Take all steps necessary to implement the provisions of this section. SECTION 9.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.